felt coat, stretched his legs, and set his cap straight. The head of the
turning for a moment to the front line, and slightly swinging his arms,
forward, and experienced great happiness.
could clearly distinguish their bandoliers, red epaulets, and even their
legs and turned-out toes, climbed the hill with difficulty.) Prince
Bagratión gave no further orders and silently continued to walk on in
French, smoke appeared all along their uneven ranks, and musket shots
who had marched so gaily and complacently. But at the moment the first
report was heard, Bagratión looked round and shouted, “Hurrah!”
“Hurrah—ah!—ah!” rang a long-drawn shout from our ranks, and
passing Bagratión and racing one another they rushed in an irregular
but joyous and eager crowd down the hill at their disordered foe.
French were putting out the fire which the wind was spreading, and thus
of the dip in the ground at the rear was hurried and noisy, but the
of the Azóv and Podólsk infantry and the Pávlograd hussars—was
simultaneously attacked and outflanked by superior French forces under
Lannes and was thrown into confusion. Bagratión had sent Zherkóv
to the general commanding that left flank with orders to retreat
Zherkóv, not removing his hand from his cap, turned his horse about
and galloped off. But no sooner had he left Bagratión than his courage
failed him. He was seized by panic and could not go where it was
firing was, he began to look for the general and his staff where they
could not possibly be, and so did not deliver the order.
The command of the left flank belonged by seniority to the commander of
the regiment Kutúzov had reviewed at Braunau and in which Dólokhov was
serving as a private. But the command of the extreme left flank had been
assigned to the commander of the Pávlograd regiment in which Rostóv
was serving, and a misunderstanding arose. The two commanders were much
exasperated with one another and, long after the action had begun on
the right flank and the French were already advancing, were engaged
regiments, both cavalry and infantry, were by no means ready for the
battle and were engaged in peaceful occupations, the cavalry feeding the
horses and the infantry collecting wood.
hussars, flushing and addressing an adjutant who had ridden up, “so
But haste was becoming imperative. Cannon and musketry, mingling
together, thundered on the right and in the center, while the capotes
of Lannes’ sharpshooters were already seen crossing the milldam and
command of the infantry went toward his horse with jerky steps, and
having mounted drew himself up very straight and tall and rode to the
Pávlograd commander. The commanders met with polite bows but with
occupy the position and prepare for an attack.”
“I am not in the cavalry, Colonel, but I am a Russian general and if
touching his horse and turning purple in the face. “Vill you be so
goot to come to ze front and see dat zis position iss no goot? I don’t
and I won’t allow it to be said!”
general expanded his chest and rode, frowning, beside him to the
bullets. They reached the front, several bullets sped over them, and
was impossible for cavalry to act among the bushes and broken ground,
and colonel looked sternly and significantly at one another like two
there was nothing to be said, and neither wished to give occasion for
and a muffled shout almost behind them in the wood. The French had
there was nothing between the squadron and the enemy, and again that
terrible dividing line of uncertainty and fear—resembling the line
conscious of this unseen line, and the question whether they would cross
it or not, and how they would cross it, agitated them all.
to him by the officers, and, like a man desperately insisting on having
of an attack spread through the squadron. The command to form up rang
out and the sabers whizzed as they were drawn from their scabbards.
Still no one moved. The troops of the left flank, infantry and hussars
alike, felt that the commander did not himself know what to do, and this
reins and started of his own accord.
Before him, on the right, Rostóv saw the front lines of his hussars and
“Faster!” came the word of command, and Rostóv felt Rook’s flanks
Rostóv anticipated his horse’s movements and became more and more
in the middle of the line that had seemed so terrible—and now he
had crossed that line and not only was there nothing terrible, but
everything was becoming more and more happy and animated. “Oh, how I
now,” thought Rostóv driving his spurs into Rook and letting him go
from him, and Rostóv felt as in a dream that he continued to be carried
behind him Bondarchúk, an hussar he knew, jolted against him and looked
angrily at him. Bondarchúk’s horse swerved and galloped past.
asked and answered at the same instant. He was alone in the middle of a
field. Instead of the moving horses and hussars’ backs, he saw nothing
before him but the motionless earth and the stubble around him. There
was warm blood under his arm. “No, I am wounded and the horse is
having become entangled in the saddle. Where our men were, and where the
and could not answer. “Can something bad have happened to me?”
he wondered as he got up: and at that moment he felt that something
it were not his. He examined his hand carefully, vainly trying to find
came a man wearing a strange shako and a blue cloak, swarthy, sunburned,
and with a hooked nose. Then came two more, and many more running
was being held by the arms and his horse was being led behind him.
Frenchmen, and though but a moment before he had been galloping to get
at them and hack them to pieces, their proximity now seemed so awful
is so fond of?” He remembered his mother’s love for him, and his
family’s, and his friends’, and the enemy’s intention to kill him
and running so lightly, frightened Rostóv. He seized his pistol and,
instead of firing it, flung it at the Frenchman and ran with all his
and conflict with which he had trodden the Enns bridge, but with the
of fear for his young and happy life, possessed his whole being. Rapidly
used to show at catchplay, now and then turning his good-natured, pale,
round once more. The French had fallen behind, and just as he looked
round the first man changed his run to a walk and, turning, shouted
Frenchman also stopped and took aim. Rostóv closed his eyes and stooped
down. One bullet and then another whistled past him. He mustered his
last remaining strength, took hold of his left hand with his right, and
of the wood ran out of it, the different companies getting mixed, and
senseless cry, “Cut off!” that is so terrible in battle, and that
The moment he heard the firing and the cry from behind, the general
realized that something dreadful had happened to his regiment, and the
recalcitrant cavalry colonel, his own dignity as a general, and above
all quite forgetting the danger and all regard for self-preservation, he
clutched the crupper of his saddle and, spurring his horse, galloped to
missed him. His one desire was to know what was happening and at any
the copse across which our men, regardless of orders, were running and
attend to the voice of their commander, or would they, disregarding him,
distorted out of all likeness to his former self, and the flourishing of
air, and disobeying orders. The moral hesitation which decided the fate
The general had a fit of coughing as a result of shouting and of the
powder smoke and stopped in despair. Everything seemed lost. But at that
moment the French who were attacking, suddenly and without any apparent
reason, ran back and disappeared from the outskirts, and Russian
company, which alone had maintained its order in the wood and, having
a desperate cry and such mad, drunken determination that, taken by
surprise, the French had thrown down their muskets and run. Dólokhov,
running beside Timókhin, killed a Frenchman at close quarters and was
fugitives returned, the battalions re-formed, and the French who had
reserve units were able to join up, and the fight was at an end. The
regimental commander and Major Ekonómov had stopped beside a bridge,
and took hold of the commander’s stirrup, almost leaning against him.
or cap, his head was bandaged, and over his shoulder a French munition
pouch was slung. He had an officer’s sword in his hand. The soldier
was pale, his blue eyes looked impudently into the commander’s face,
and his lips were smiling. Though the commander was occupied in giving
to the French sword and pouch. “I have taken an officer prisoner. I
stopped the company.” Dólokhov breathed heavily from weariness and
“All right, all right,” replied the commander, and turned to Major
But Dólokhov did not go away; he untied the handkerchief around his
head, pulled it off, and showed the blood congealed on his hair.
Túshin’s battery had been forgotten and only at the very end of the
send his orderly staff officer, and later Prince Andrew also, to order
by someone’s order, the battery had continued firing and was only not
Grand! Look at the smoke, the smoke!” exclaimed the artillerymen,
cried at each shot: “Fine! That’s good! Look at it... Grand!” The
and began firing them at Túshin’s battery.
In their childlike glee, aroused by the fire and their luck in
battery when two balls, and then four more, fell among our guns, one
knocking over two horses and another tearing off a munition-wagon
reserve gun carriage, the wounded were carried away, and the four guns
had been killed at the beginning of the engagement and within an hour
the artillerymen were still as merry and lively as ever. Twice they
noticed the French appearing below them, and then they fired grapeshot
Little Túshin, moving feebly and awkwardly, kept telling his orderly to
“refill my pipe for that one!” and then, scattering sparks from it,
ran forward shading his eyes with his small hand to look at the French.
wheels and working the screws himself.
dead or wounded horses and harnessing fresh ones, and shouting in his
feeble voice, so high pitched and irresolute. His face grew more and
more animated. Only when a man was killed or wounded did he frown and
for the most part handsome fellows and, as is always the case in an
artillery company, a head and shoulders taller and twice as broad
as their officer—all looked at their commander like children in an
embarrassing situation, and the expression on his face was invariably
Owing to the terrible uproar and the necessity for concentration and
fear, and the thought that he might be killed or badly wounded never
occurred to him. On the contrary, he became more and more elated. It
had first seen the enemy and fired the first shot, and that the corner
of the field he stood on was well-known and familiar ground. Though he
thought of everything, considered everything, and did everything the
From the deafening sounds of his own guns around him, the whistle and
thud of the enemy’s cannon balls, from the flushed and perspiring
of men and horses, from the little puffs of smoke on the enemy’s side
(always followed by a ball flying past and striking the earth, a man, a
his own had taken possession of his brain and at that moment afforded
small cloud rose from the hill and was borne in a streak to the left by
“What do you want, your honor?” asked an artilleryman, standing
was large and of an old pattern. The French swarming round their guns
seemed to him like ants. In that world, the handsome drunkard Number One
often than at anyone else and took delight in his every movement.
the ebb and flow of these sounds.
cannon balls at the French with both hands.
“Are you mad? You have twice been ordered to retreat, and you...”
ball, flying close to him, caused him to duck and bend over his horse.
He paused, and just as he was about to say something more, another ball
stopped him. He turned his horse and galloped off.
and he felt a nervous shudder run down his spine. But the mere thought
and dismounted slowly among the guns. He delivered the order and did
positions and withdrawn in his presence. Together with Túshin, stepping
across the bodies and under a terrible fire from the French, he attended
(one shattered gun and one unicorn were left behind), Prince Andrew rode
“Well, till we meet again...” he said, holding out his hand to
dear fellow!” and for some unknown reason tears suddenly filled his
The wind had fallen and black clouds, merging with the powder smoke,
dark and the glow of two conflagrations was the more conspicuous. The
cannonade was dying down, but the rattle of musketry behind and on the
right sounded oftener and nearer. As soon as Túshin with his guns,
of fire and had descended into the dip, he was met by some of the staff,
among them the staff officer and Zherkóv, who had been twice sent to
another, they all gave, and transmitted, orders as to how to proceed,
reprimanding and reproaching him. Túshin gave no orders, and,
the orders were to abandon the wounded, many of them dragged themselves
after troops and begged for seats on the gun carriages. The jaunty
cadet, supporting one hand with the other, came up to Túshin and asked
It was plain that this cadet had already repeatedly asked for a lift and
The cadet was Rostóv. With one hand he supported the other; he was
pale and his jaw trembled, shivering feverishly. He was placed on
breeches and arm.
infantry, and having reached the village of Gruntersdorf they halted. It
off, and the firing had begun to subside. Suddenly, near by on the
right, shouting and firing were again heard. Flashes of shot gleamed in
the darkness. This was the last French attack and was met by soldiers
the village again, but Túshin’s guns could not move, and the
artillerymen, Túshin, and the cadet exchanged silent glances as they
awaited their fate. The firing died down and soldiers, talking eagerly,
The French had been repulsed for the last time. And again and again in
always in one direction, humming with whispers and talk and the sound of
hoofs and wheels. Amid the general rumble, the groans and voices of the
a white horse followed by his suite, and said something in passing:
closer together and a report spread that they were ordered to halt:
Fires were lighted and the talk became more audible. Captain Túshin,
station or a doctor for the cadet, and sat down by a bonfire the
fire. From pain, cold, and damp, a feverish shivering shook his whole
position. He kept closing his eyes and then again looking at the fire,
which seemed to him dazzlingly red, and at the feeble, round-shouldered
Túshin’s large, kind, intelligent eyes were fixed with sympathy and
From all sides were heard the footsteps and talk of the infantry, who
were walking, driving past, and settling down all around. The sound
crackling of wood fires near and afar, merged into one tremulous rumble.
gloom, but a dark sea swelling and gradually subsiding after a storm.
Rostóv looked at and listened listlessly to what passed before and
his hands to the blaze, and turned away his face.
With the soldier, an infantry officer with a bandaged cheek came up to
the bonfire, and addressing Túshin asked him to have the guns moved a
the campfire. They were quarreling and fighting desperately, each trying
Then a thin, pale soldier, his neck bandaged with a bloodstained leg
band, came up and in angry tones asked the artillerymen for water.
Next came four soldiers, carrying something heavy on a cloak, and passed
Túshin rose and, buttoning his greatcoat and pulling it straight,
for him, Prince Bagratión sat at dinner, talking with some commanding
the half-closed eyes was there greedily gnawing a mutton bone, and the
glass of vodka and the dinner; and the staff officer with the signet
ring, and Zherkóv, uneasily glancing at them all, and Prince Andrew,
pale, with compressed lips and feverishly glittering eyes.
In a corner of the hut stood a standard captured from the French, and
individual commanders and inquiring into details of the action and our
from the wood, mustered the men who were woodcutting, and, allowing the
French to pass him, had made a bayonet charge with two battalions and
disorganized, I stopped in the road and thought: ‘I’ll let them
come on and will meet them with the fire of the whole battalion’—and
The general had so wished to do this and was so sorry he had not managed
continued—remembering Dólokhov’s conversation with Kutúzov and his
presence and particularly distinguished himself.”
the glory of our arms and of the day’s work, they assumed a serious
infantry, cavalry, and artillery. How was it that two guns were
abandoned in the center?” he inquired, searching with his eyes for
flank; he knew that all the guns there had been abandoned at the very
“One was damaged,” answered the staff officer, “and the other I
can’t understand. I was there all the time giving orders and had only
village and had already been sent for.
and abruptly.
All were silent. Túshin appeared at the threshold and made his way
sight of his superiors, he did not notice the staff of the banner and
“How was it a gun was abandoned?” asked Bagratión, frowning, not so
and the disgrace of having lost two guns and yet remaining alive present
jaw trembling and was hardly able to mutter: “I don’t know... your
trouble, and silently fixed his eyes on Bagratión as a schoolboy who
intervene. Prince Andrew looked at Túshin from under his brows and his
went there and found two thirds of the men and horses knocked out, two
guns smashed, and no supports at all.”
Prince Bagratión and Túshin looked with equal intentness at
battery and the heroic endurance of Captain Túshin and his company,”
and without awaiting a reply, Prince Andrew rose and left the table.
to credit it, bent his head, and told Túshin that he could go. Prince
Prince Andrew gave him a look, but said nothing and went away. He felt
sad and depressed. It was all so strange, so unlike what he had hoped.
him. The pain in his arm became more and more intense. Irresistible
drowsiness overpowered him, red rings danced before his eyes, and the
impression of those voices and faces and a sense of loneliness merged
with the physical pain. It was they, these soldiers—wounded and
unwounded—it was they who were crushing, weighing down, and twisting
the sinews and scorching the flesh of his sprained arm and shoulder. To
appeared to him in a dream: his mother and her large white hand,
Sónya’s thin little shoulders, Natásha’s eyes and laughter,
Denísov with his voice and mustache, and Telyánin and all that affair
with Telyánin and Bogdánich. That affair was the same thing as this
soldier with the harsh voice, and it was that affair and this soldier
that were so agonizingly, incessantly pulling and pressing his arm and
He opened his eyes and looked up. The black canopy of night hung less
pity me. Yet I was once at home, strong, happy, and loved.” He sighed
and, doing so, groaned involuntarily.
out over the fire, and not waiting for an answer he gave a grunt and
fluttering above the fire and remembered a Russian winter at his warm,
healthy body, and all the affection and care of his family. “And why
Next day the French army did not renew their attack, and the remnant of
was merely a man of the world who had got on and to whom getting on had
become a habit. Schemes and devices for which he never rightly accounted
circumstances and persons he met. Of these plans he had not merely one
some approaching achievement, and some in course of disintegration. He
must gain his confidence and friendship and through him obtain a special
entice him to marry my daughter and lend me the forty thousand rubles
immediately told him that this man could be useful, and without any
confidence, flatter him, become intimate with him, and finally make his
He had Pierre at hand in Moscow and procured for him an appointment as
Councilor of State, and insisted on the young man accompanying him to
Petersburg and staying at his house. With apparent absent-mindedness,
he thought out his plans beforehand he could not have been so natural
and shown such unaffected familiarity in intercourse with everybody both
above and below him in social standing. Something always drew him toward
those richer and more powerful than himself and he had rare skill in
Pierre, on unexpectedly becoming Count Bezúkhov and a rich man, felt
himself after his recent loneliness and freedom from cares so beset and
estate near Moscow, and to receive many people who formerly did not
and grieved had he chosen not to see them. These different
people—businessmen, relations, and acquaintances alike—were all
disposed to treat the young heir in the most friendly and flattering
honorable, Count,” or, “Were he as clever as you,” and so on,
till he began sincerely to believe in his own exceptional kindness and
had always seemed to him that he really was very kind and intelligent.
Even people who had formerly been spiteful toward him and evidently
unfriendly now became gentle and affectionate. The angry eldest
princess, with the long waist and hair plastered down like a doll’s,
and frequent blushes she told him she was very sorry about their past
misunderstandings and did not now feel she had a right to ask him for
to remain for a few weeks longer in the house she so loved and where
took her hand and begged her forgiveness, without knowing what for.
From that day the eldest princess quite changed toward Pierre and began
great deal from the deceased,” said Prince Vasíli to him, handing him
this bone—a bill for thirty thousand rubles—to the poor princess
the inlaid portfolio. Pierre signed the deed and after that the princess
him feel confused by her smiles and her own confusion when meeting him.
It seemed so natural to Pierre that everyone should like him, and it
was always busy and always felt in a state of mild and cheerful
intoxication. He felt as though he were the center of some important and
he did not do it he would grieve and disappoint many people, but if he
did this and that, all would be well; and he did what was demanded of
affairs and of Pierre himself in those early days. From the death of
a man oppressed by business, weary and suffering, who yet would not, for
his old friend and the possessor of such enormous wealth, to the caprice
of fate and the designs of rogues. During the few days he spent in
go to him himself, and tell him what ought to be done in a tone of
weariness and assurance, as if he were adding every time: “You know
I am overwhelmed with business and it is purely out of charity that
I trouble myself about you, and you also know quite well that what I
Vasíli one day, closing his eyes and fingering Pierre’s elbow,
upon and could not now be altered. “We start tomorrow and I’m giving
here is now settled, and I ought to have been off long ago. Here is
something I have received from the chancellor. I asked him for you, and
you have been entered in the diplomatic corps and made a Gentleman of
Notwithstanding the tone of wearied assurance with which these words
and there is nothing to thank me for. No one has ever complained yet of
being too much loved; and besides, you are free, you could throw it
“You know, mon cher, your father and I had some accounts to settle, so
I have received what was due from the Ryazán estate and will keep it;
several thousand rubles quitrent received from Pierre’s peasants,
gentleness and affection. He could not refuse the post, or rather the
and acquaintances, invitations, and social occupations were so numerous
and continual expectation of some good, always in front of him but never
a friend older than himself and whom he respected. His whole time
was taken up with dinners and balls and was spent chiefly at Prince
Vasíli’s house in the company of the stout princess, his wife, and
what he was saying was out of place, tactless and unsuitable, that
stupidest remarks came out clever and apt. Now everything Pierre said
she wished to and only refrained out of regard for his modesty.
link which other people recognized had grown up between himself and
Hélène, and that thought both alarmed him, as if some obligation were
being imposed on him which he could not fulfill, and pleased him as an
Emperor Alexander’s visit to Potsdam, and of how the two august
afflicted by the death of the father he had hardly known), and her
Prince Vasíli and the generals, had the benefit of the diplomat.
but Anna Pávlovna—who was in the excited condition of a commander on
a battlefield to whom thousands of new and brilliant ideas occur which
(She glanced at Hélène and smiled at her.) “My dear Hélène, be
charitable to my poor aunt who adores you. Go and keep her company for
I only wanted to know your opinion,” and Anna Pávlovna let Pierre go.
her beauty and her remarkable skill in appearing silently dignified in
desirous of hiding her adoration for Hélène and inclined rather
say that it is dull in my house again,” and she glanced at Hélène.
coughed, swallowed, and said in French that she was very pleased to see
and the same look. In the middle of a dull and halting conversation,
to everyone. Pierre was so used to that smile, and it had so little
father, Count Bezúkhov, and showed them her own box. Princess Hélène
asked to see the portrait of the aunt’s husband on the box lid.
a celebrated miniaturist, and he leaned over the table to take the
He half rose, meaning to go round, but the aunt handed him the snuffbox,
room, and looked round with a smile. She was, as always at evening
front and back. Her bust, which had always seemed like marble to Pierre,
the living charm of her neck and shoulders, so near to his lips that
conscious of the warmth of her body, the scent of perfume, and the
wife, and that it could not be otherwise.
He knew this at that moment as surely as if he had been standing at the
altar with her. How and when this would be he did not know, he did not
Pierre dropped his eyes, lifted them again, and wished once more to see
mist and taking it for a tree can again take it for a tree after he has
She already had power over him, and between them there was no longer any
This was true. The architect had told him that it was necessary, and
muttered something and colored.
and she with him, that there was quite a scandal and that that’s why
(the reflection was still incomplete), he caught himself smiling and was
conscious that another line of thought had sprung up, and while thinking
wife, how she would love him become quite different, and how all he had
thought and heard of her might be false. And he again saw her not as the
before?” and again he told himself that it was impossible, that there
would be something unnatural, and as it seemed to him dishonorable, in
this marriage. He recalled her former words and looks and the words
and looks of those who had seen them together. He recalled Anna
Pávlovna’s words and looks when she spoke to him about his house,
recalled thousands of such hints from Prince Vasíli and others, and was
something that was evidently wrong and that he ought not to do. But at
visit his neglected estates at the same time and pick up his son Anatole
where his regiment was stationed, and take him to visit Prince Nicholas
rich old man. But before leaving home and undertaking these new affairs,
where he was staying, and had been absurd, excited, and foolish in
Lëlya’s name day. I will invite two or three people, and if he does
not understand what he ought to do then it will be my affair—yes, my
Six weeks after Anna Pávlovna’s “At Home” and after the sleepless
night when he had decided that to marry Hélène would be a calamity and
that he ought to avoid her and go away, Pierre, despite that decision,
had not left Prince Vasíli’s and felt with terror that in people’s
eyes he was every day more and more connected with her, that it was
could not break away from her, and that though it would be a terrible
the general pleasure and disappoint everyone’s expectation. Prince
hand in passing and draw it downwards, or absent-mindedly hold out his
wrinkled, clean-shaven cheek for Pierre to kiss and would say: “Till
am staying in for your sake,” and so on. And though Prince Vasíli,
Every day he said to himself one and the same thing: “It is time I
understood her and made up my mind what she really is. Was I mistaken
always clear and simple, so she is not stupid. She never was abashed and
to make reflections or think aloud in her company, and she had always
did not interest her—or by a silent look and smile which more palpably
waiting for him to say a word and cross a certain line, and he knew that
seized him at the thought of that dreadful step. A thousand times during
that month and a half while he felt himself drawn nearer and nearer to
he lacked that strength of will which he had known in himself and really
themselves quite innocent, and since that day when he was overpowered
and relations had been given to understand that the fate of the young
Princess Kurágina, a portly imposing woman who had once been handsome,
more important guests—an old general and his wife, and Anna Pávlovna
Schérer. At the other end sat the younger and less important guests,
and there too sat the members of the family, and Pierre and Hélène,
the guests. To each of them he made some careless and agreeable remark
except to Pierre and Hélène, whose presence he seemed not to notice.
He enlivened the whole party. The wax candles burned brightly, the
silver and crystal gleamed, so did the ladies’ toilets and the gold
and silver of the men’s epaulets; servants in scarlet liveries moved
round the table, the clatter of plates, knives, and glasses mingled with
received and read the then famous rescript of the Emperor Alexander
the declaration from Petersburg gave him particular pleasure, and that
he was proud to be at the head of such a nation and would endeavor to be
“Well, and so he never got farther than: ‘Sergéy Kuzmích’?”
He began the rescript again and again, but as soon as he uttered
‘Sergéy’ he sobbed, ‘Kuz-mí-ch,’ tears, and ‘From all
sides’ was smothered in sobs and he could get no farther. And again
his handkerchief, and again: ‘Sergéy Kuzmích, From all sides,’...
and tears, till at last somebody else was asked to read it.”
“Kuzmích... From all sides... and then tears,” someone repeated
holding up a threatening finger. “He is such a worthy and excellent
honored guests sat, everyone seemed to be in high spirits and under the
influence of a variety of exciting sensations. Only Pierre and
feelings. But much as all the rest laughed, talked, and joked, much
as they enjoyed their Rhine wine, sauté, and ices, and however they
avoided looking at the young couple, and heedless and unobservant as
that the story about Sergéy Kuzmích, the laughter, and the food
were all a pretense, and that the whole attention of that company was
directed to—Pierre and Hélène. Prince Vasíli mimicked the sobbing
of Sergéy Kuzmích and at the same time his eyes glanced toward his
daughter, and while he laughed the expression on his face clearly said:
Pávlovna threatened him on behalf of “our dear Vyazmítinov,” and
read a congratulation on his future son-in-law and on his daughter’s
old lady next to her and glanced angrily at her daughter, and her sigh
seemed to say: “Yes, there’s nothing left for you and me but to sip
Into the insignificant, trifling, and artificial interests uniting that
and handsome young man and woman for one another. And this human feeling
dominated everything else and soared above all their affected chatter.
Jests fell flat, news was not interesting, and the animation was
table seemed to feel this, and they forgot their duties as they looked
at the beautiful Hélène with her radiant face and at the red, broad,
and happy though uneasy face of Pierre. It seemed as if the very light
of the candles was focused on those two happy faces alone.
Pierre felt that he was the center of it all, and this both pleased and
He did not see, hear, or understand anything clearly. Only now and
then detached ideas and impressions from the world of reality shot
awkward to attract everyone’s attention and to be considered a
lucky man and, with his plain face, to be looked on as a sort of Paris
possessed of a Helen. “But no doubt it always is and must be so!”
with her and picked up her reticule and drove out with her. How did it
that it was not she but he was so unusually beautiful, and that that was
why they all looked so at him, and flattered by this general admiration
he would expand his chest, raise his head, and rejoice at his good
second time. But Pierre was so absorbed that he did not understand what
Prince Vasíli smiled, and Pierre noticed that everyone was smiling at
him and Hélène. “Well, what of it, if you all know it?” thought
Pierre. “What of it? It’s the truth!” and he himself smiled his
gentle childlike smile, and Hélène smiled too.
occupation, came up to her for a moment and made haste to go away,
footsteps. Pierre rose and said it was getting late. Prince Vasíli gave
severity changed, and he drew Pierre’s hand downwards, made him sit
down, and smiled affectionately.
“Well, Lëlya?” he asked, turning instantly to his daughter and
about Sergéy Kuzmích that interested Prince Vasíli just then, and
something and went away. It seemed to Pierre that even the prince was
touched Pierre: he looked at Hélène and she too seemed disconcerted,
and her look seemed to say: “Well, it is your own fault.”
and he again began speaking about indifferent matters, about Sergéy
Prince Vasíli passed by, seeming not to hear the ladies, and sat down
on a sofa in a far corner of the room. He closed his eyes and seemed to
be dozing. His head sank forward and then he roused himself.
“Aline,” he said to his wife, “go and see what they are about.”
The princess went up to the door, passed by it with a dignified and
indifferent air, and glanced into the little drawing room. Pierre and
“Still the same,” she said to her husband.
Prince Vasíli frowned, twisting his mouth, his cheeks quivered and his
himself, he rose, threw back his head, and with resolute steps went
everything!” (He put one arm around Pierre and the other around his
voice trembled.) “I loved your father... and she will make you a good
He embraced his daughter, and then again Pierre, and kissed him with his
The old princess came in and also wept. The elderly lady was using
her handkerchief too. Pierre was kissed, and he kissed the beautiful
Hélène’s hand several times. After a while they were left alone
“All this had to be and could not be otherwise,” thought Pierre,
it’s definite and one is rid of the old tormenting doubt.” Pierre
held the hand of his betrothed in silence, looking at her beautiful
bosom as it rose and fell.
“Hélène!” he said aloud and paused.
Pierre took them off, and his eyes, besides the strange look eyes have
from which spectacles have just been removed, had also a frightened and
inquiring look. He was about to stoop over her hand and kiss it, but
lips and met them with her own. Her face struck Pierre, by its altered,
Six weeks later he was married, and settled in Count Bezúkhov’s
said, of a wife who was a celebrated beauty and of millions of money.
in November, 1805, announcing that he and his son would be paying him
a visit. “I am starting on a journey of inspection, and of course I
shall think nothing of an extra seventy miles to come and see you at
evening in advance of him, and he and his son arrived next day.
character, but more so recently, since in the new reigns of Paul and
Alexander Prince Vasíli had risen to high position and honors. And now,
from the hints contained in his letter and given by the little princess,
he saw which way the wind was blowing, and his low opinion changed into
particularly discontented and out of temper. Whether he was in a bad
in a bad temper, and in the morning Tíkhon had already advised the
collar and cap, went out for his usual walk. It had snowed the day
before and the path to the hothouse, along which the prince was in the
visible in the snow and a shovel had been left sticking in one of the
through the conservatories, the serfs’ quarters, and the outbuildings,
frowning and silent.
resembling his master in manners and looks, who was accompanying him
The prince bowed his head and went up to the porch. “God be
The prince turned round to the overseer and fixed his eyes on him,
“You thought!” shouted the prince, his words coming more and more
rapidly and indistinctly. “You thought!... Rascals! Blackguards!...
I’ll teach you to think!” and lifting his stick he swung it and
Before dinner, Princess Mary and Mademoiselle Bourienne, who knew
same as usual,” and Princess Mary pale, frightened, and with downcast
sympathize with him; if I seem sad and out of spirits myself, he will
The prince looked at his daughter’s frightened face and snorted.
His plate seemed to him not quite clean, and pointing to a spot he
flung it away. Tíkhon caught it and handed it to a footman. The little
In general at Bald Hills the little princess lived in constant fear, and
days with her, asked her to sleep in her room, and often talked with her
about the old prince and criticized him.
Excellency Prince Vasíli Kurágin and his son, I understand?” she
don’t understand. Perhaps Princess Elizabeth and Princess Mary know.
conservatories and the beauty of a flower that had just opened, and
had sunk, her lip was drawn up, and her eyes drawn down.
He left the room and went to the waiting room where Alpátych stood with
“All right, all right,” interrupted the prince, and laughing his
unnatural way, he stretched out his hand for Alpátych to kiss, and then
coachmen and footmen, who, with loud shouts, dragged his sleighs up to
Prince Vasíli and Anatole had separate rooms assigned to them.
table on a corner of which he smilingly and absent-mindedly fixed his
large and handsome eyes. He regarded his whole life as a continual round
And he looked on this visit to a churlish old man and a rich and ugly
and amusingly. “And why not marry her if she really has so much money?
He shaved and scented himself with the care and elegance which had
become habitual to him and, his handsome head held high, entered his
father’s room with the good-humored and victorious air natural to
him. Prince Vasíli’s two valets were busy dressing him, and he looked
round with much animation and cheerfully nodded to his son as the latter
“Enough! What nonsense! Above all, try to be respectful and cautious
the minister and his son had arrived, but the appearance of both had
The little princess and Mademoiselle Bourienne had already received
from Másha, the lady’s maid, the necessary report of how handsome the
minister’s son was, with his rosy cheeks and dark eyebrows, and with
this information, the little princess and Mademoiselle Bourienne, whose
in, and sinking heavily into an armchair.
but had on one of her best dresses. Her hair was carefully done and her
face was animated, which, however, did not conceal its sunken and faded
fresh and pretty face yet more attractive.
room and we shall have to go down, and you have not smartened yourself
The little princess got up, rang for the maid, and hurriedly and merrily
began to devise and carry out a plan of how Princess Mary should be
the arrival of a suitor agitated her, and still more so by both
otherwise. To tell them that she felt ashamed for herself and for them
dress her would prolong their banter and insistence. She flushed, her
beautiful eyes grew dim, red blotches came on her face, and it took
submitted herself to Mademoiselle Bourienne and Lise. Both these women
her with perfect sincerity, and with the naïve and firm conviction
It was not the dress, but the face and whole figure of Princess Mary
in the hair, the hair combed up, and the blue scarf arranged lower on
the best maroon dress, and so on, all would be well. They forgot that
the frightened face and the figure could not be altered, and that
however they might change the setting and adornment of that face, it
would still remain piteous and plain. After two or three changes to
on the top of her head (a style that quite altered and spoiled her
looks) and she had put on a maroon dress with a pale-blue scarf, the
dress with her little hand, now arranging the scarf and looking at her
with her head bent first on one side and then on the other.
“No, it will not do,” she said decidedly, clasping her hands. “No,
to the maid, “bring the princess her gray dress, and you’ll see,
sitting motionless before the glass, looking at her face, and saw in the
mirror her eyes full of tears and her mouth quivering, ready to burst
“Well, now we’ll arrange something quite simple and becoming,” she
The three voices, hers, Mademoiselle Bourienne’s, and Katie’s, who
Her voice sounded so serious and so sad that the chirping of the birds
eyes full of tears and of thoughts, gazing shiningly and imploringly at
them, and understood that it was useless and even cruel to insist.
Mademoiselle Bourienne and the little princess had to own to themselves
both knew, an expression thoughtful and sad. This expression in Princess
knew that when it appeared on her face, she became mute and was not to
glass. Letting her arms fall helplessly, she sat with downcast eyes and
pondered. A husband, a man, a strong dominant and strangely attractive
being rose in her imagination, and carried her into a totally different
own breast, the husband standing by and gazing tenderly at her and the
She roused herself, and felt appalled at what she had been thinking, and
before going down she went into the room where the icons hung and, her
lamp, she stood before it with folded hands for a few moments. A painful
happiness and of children, but her strongest, most deeply hidden longing
others and even from herself, the stronger it grew. “O God,” she
seek nothing, be not anxious or envious. Man’s future and thy own fate
Princess Mary sighed, and having crossed herself went down, thinking
neither of her gown and coiffure nor of how she would go in nor of what
When Princess Mary came down, Prince Vasíli and his son were already
in the drawing room, talking to the little princess and Mademoiselle
the gentlemen and Mademoiselle Bourienne rose and the little princess,
saw them all and saw them in detail. She saw Prince Vasíli’s face,
again, and the little princess curiously noting the impression
Bourienne, with her ribbon and pretty face, and her unusually animated
something large, brilliant, and handsome moving toward her as she
entered the room. Prince Vasíli approached first, and she kissed the
bold forehead that bent over her hand and answered his question by
soft hand taking hers firmly, and she touched with her lips a white
with his right thumb under a button of his uniform, his chest expanded
and his back drawn in, slightly swinging one foot, and, with his head a
speaking and evidently not thinking about her at all. Anatole was not
faculty, so invaluable in society, of composure and imperturbable
a first introduction and betrays a consciousness of the impropriety of
such silence and an anxiety to find something to say, the effect is
bad. But Anatole was dumb, swung his foot, and smilingly examined the
them curiosity, awe, and even love—a supercilious consciousness of
looks and manner gave that impression. The princess felt this, and as if
she turned to his father. The conversation was general and animated,
thanks to Princess Lise’s voice and little downy lip that lifted over
employed by lively chatty people, and consisting in the assumption
that between the person they so address and themselves there are some
semi-private, long-established jokes and amusing reminiscences, though
Prince Vasíli readily adopted her tone and the little princess also
and even Princess Mary felt herself pleasantly made to share in these
brother Hippolyte told me about your goings on. Oh!” and she shook her
his son and seizing the little princess’ arm as if she would have run
away and he had just managed to catch her, “didn’t he tell you how
he himself was pining for the dear princess, and how she showed him the
had left Paris and how he had liked that city. Anatole answered the
Frenchwoman very readily and, looking at her with a smile, talked to her
about her native land. When he saw the pretty little Bourienne, Anatole
The old prince dressed leisurely in his study, frowning and considering
Prince Vasíli and that son of his to me? Prince Vasíli is a shallow
braggart and his son, no doubt, is a fine specimen,” he grumbled to
bring himself to part from his daughter and give her to a husband. The
prince never directly asked himself that question, knowing beforehand
that he would have to answer it justly, and justice clashed not only
certain. There’s Lise, married to Andrew—a better husband one would
lot? And who would marry Marie for love? Plain and awkward! They’ll
take her for her connections and wealth. Are there no women living
unmarried, and even the happier for it?” So thought Prince Bolkónski
while dressing, and yet the question he was always putting off demanded
intention of proposing, and today or tomorrow he would probably ask
for an answer. His birth and position in society were not bad. “Well,
coiffure, Mademoiselle Bourienne’s and Anatole’s smiles, and the
shameless, and he ignores her!”
love and befriend him.”
“Fine young fellow! Fine young fellow!” he said. “Well, come and
kiss me,” and he offered his cheek.
Anatole kissed the old man, and looked at him with curiosity and perfect
and, drawing up an armchair for Prince Vasíli, pointed to it and began
questioning him about political affairs and news. He seemed to listen
the visitors, and before the visitors I tell you that in future you are
turning to Anatole, “come here, let us talk and get acquainted.”
to read and write by the deacon, like your father and me. Now tell me,
scrutinizing Anatole closely and intently.
Tsar and the country? It is wartime. Such a fine fellow must serve.
ha!” laughed Prince Bolkónski, and Anatole laughed still louder.
“I have done my best for him, and I can assure you the education there
Prince Vasíli’s arm and led him to his study. As soon as they were
alone together, Prince Vasíli announced his hopes and wishes to the old
your presence; if she is willing, then he can stay on. He can stay and
till then. Their powers of reasoning, feeling, and observing immediately
increased tenfold, and their life, which seemed to have been passed in
Princess Mary grew quite unconscious of her face and coiffure. The
handsome open face of the man who might perhaps be her husband absorbed
all her attention. He seemed to her kind, brave, determined, manly, and
magnanimous. She felt convinced of that. Thousands of dreams of a future
family life continually rose in her imagination. She drove them away and
already, but then he cannot know what I think of him and may imagine
arrival, thought in another way. Of course, she, a handsome young woman
aloud to him and being friends with Princess Mary. Mademoiselle
ungainly Russian princesses, would fall in love with her and carry her
off; and here at last was a Russian prince. Mademoiselle Bourienne knew
seduced, and to whom her poor mother (sa pauvre mère) appeared, and
appeared. He would carry her away and then sa pauvre mère would appear
and he would marry her. So her future shaped itself in Mademoiselle
to her, and now that Anatole had appeared it just grouped itself around
him and she wished and tried to please him as much as possible.
unconsciously and quite forgetting her condition, prepared for the
struggle, but with naïve and lighthearted gaiety.
beginning to feel for the pretty and provocative Mademoiselle Bourienne
suddenness and prompt him to the coarsest and most reckless actions.
After tea, the company went into the sitting room and Princess Mary was
asked to play on the clavichord. Anatole, laughing and in high spirits,
came and leaned on his elbows, facing her and beside Mademoiselle
Her favorite sonata bore her into a most intimately poetic world and
Mademoiselle Bourienne was also looking at Princess Mary, and in her
lovely eyes there was a look of fearful joy and hope that was also new
and how happy I may be with such a friend and such a husband! Husband?
kissed Princess Mary’s hand. She did not know how she found the
courage, but she looked straight into his handsome face as it came near
to her shortsighted eyes. Turning from Princess Mary he went up and
kissed Mademoiselle Bourienne’s hand. (This was not etiquette, but
then he did everything so simply and with such assurance!) Mademoiselle
Bourienne flushed, and gave the princess a frightened look.
and not value her pure affection and devotion to me?” She went up
to her and kissed her warmly. Anatole went up to kiss the little
princess’ hand.
well I will give you my hand to kiss. Not till then!” she said. And
“Is he really to be my husband, this stranger who is so kind—yes,
kind, that is the chief thing,” thought Princess Mary; and fear, which
seemed to her that someone was there standing behind the screen in the
dark corner. And this someone was he—the devil—and he was also this
man with the white forehead, black eyebrows, and red lips.
She rang for her maid and asked her to sleep in her room.
Mademoiselle Bourienne walked up and down the conservatory for a long
awkward and uncomfortable, and her burden oppressed her now more than
when she was not like that and when everything was light and gay. She
sat in an armchair in her dressing jacket and nightcap and Katie, sleepy
and disheveled, beat and turned the heavy feather bed for the third
“I told you it was all lumps and holes!” the little princess
fault!” and her voice quivered like that of a child about to cry.
pacing angrily about and snorting. The old prince felt as though he
the whole matter and decide what was right and how he should act, but
instead of that he only excited himself more and more.
“The first man that turns up—she forgets her father and everything
else, runs upstairs and does up her hair and wags her tail and is unlike
nothing of her and looks only at Bourienne. No, she has no pride... but
mistake and that Anatole meant to flirt with Mademoiselle Bourienne,
Princess Mary’s self-esteem would be wounded and his point (not to
thought, he called Tíkhon and began to undress.
putting the nightshirt over his dried-up old body and gray-haired chest.
“I never invited them. They came to disturb my life—and there is not
Tíkhon knew his master’s habit of sometimes thinking aloud, and
Vasíli and his son.
“They have gone to bed and put out their lights, your excellency.”
“No good... no good...” said the prince rapidly, and thrusting his
feet into his slippers and his arms into the sleeves of his dressing
Though no words had passed between Anatole and Mademoiselle Bourienne,
much to say to one another in private and so they had been seeking an
and Anatole met in the conservatory.
read this in Tíkhon’s face and in that of Prince Vasíli’s valet,
The old prince was very affectionate and careful in his treatment of
dry hands clenched with vexation at her not understanding a sum in
not come and brought his pupil with him” (for some reason Prince
and, as you know my principles, I refer it to you.”
“How am I to understand you, mon père?” said the princess, growing
pale and then blushing.
“How understand me!” cried her father angrily. “Prince Vasíli
finds you to his taste as a daughter-in-law and makes a proposal to you
understand it’!... And I ask you!”
submit from habit, and she said: “I wish only to do your will, but if
dowry and take Mademoiselle Bourienne into the bargain. She’ll be the
daughter. She lowered her head and was ready to burst into tears.
“There’s no need to talk! He receives his orders and will marry you
over, and come back in an hour and tell me in his presence: yes or no.
Her fate was decided and happily decided. But what her father had said
still it was terrible, and she could not help thinking of it. She was
Bourienne aroused her. She raised her eyes, and two steps away saw
Anatole embracing the Frenchwoman and whispering something to her. With
a horrified expression on his handsome face, Anatole looked at Princess
Princess Mary looked at them in silence. She could not understand it. At
last Mademoiselle Bourienne gave a scream and ran away. Anatole bowed to
this strange incident, and then shrugging his shoulders went to the door
Mademoiselle Bourienne in her arms and gently stroking her hair. The
looking with tender affection and pity at Mademoiselle Bourienne’s
“Why? I love you more than ever,” said Princess Mary, “and I will
“But you despise me. You who are so pure can never understand being so
“I quite understand,” answered Princess Mary, with a sad smile.
“Calm yourself, my dear. I will go to my father,” she said, and went
Prince Vasíli, with one leg thrown high over the other and a snuffbox
in his hand, was sitting there with a smile of deep emotion on his face,
as if stirred to his heart’s core and himself regretting and laughing
“Ah, my dear, my dear!” he began, rising and taking her by both
hands. Then, sighing, he added: “My son’s fate is in your hands.
He drew back and a real tear appeared in his eye.
he shouted, “and then I shall reserve the right to state my opinion
also. Yes, my opinion, and only my opinion,” added Prince Bolkónski,
turning to Prince Vasíli and answering his imploring look. “Yes, or
glancing at Prince Vasíli and at her father with her beautiful eyes.
frowning and taking his daughter’s hand; he did not kiss her, but only
bending his forehead to hers just touched it, and pressed her hand so
that she winced and uttered a cry.
this heart, so kind and generous? Say ‘perhaps’... The future is so
of love and self-sacrifice. And cost what it may, I will arrange
poor Amélie’s happiness, she loves him so passionately, and so
father and Andrew. I shall be so happy when she is his wife. She is so
was the count at last handed a letter addressed in his son’s
handwriting. On receiving it, he ran on tiptoe to his study in alarm and
haste, trying to escape notice, closed the door, and began to read the
on hearing of the arrival of the letter went softly into the room and
found the count with it in his hand, sobbing and laughing at the same
Anna Mikháylovna sat down beside him, with her own handkerchief wiped
the tears from his eyes and from the letter, then having dried her
own eyes she comforted the count, and decided that at dinner and till
teatime she would prepare the countess, and after tea, with God’s
and about Nikólenka, twice asked when the last letter had been received
from him, though she knew that already, and remarked that they might
hints began to make the countess anxious and she glanced uneasily at
the count and at Anna Mikháylovna, the latter very adroitly turned
intonation, look, and expression, pricked up her ears from the beginning
of the meal and was certain that there was some secret between her
father and Anna Mikháylovna, that it had something to do with her
brother, and that Anna Mikháylovna was preparing them for it. Bold as
but she was too excited to eat anything and kept wriggling about on her
headlong after Anna Mikháylovna and, dashing at her, flung herself on
“I will, I will, only tell me! You won’t? Then I will go and tell at
“I won’t tell anyone!” and she ran off at once to Sónya.
She rushed to Sónya, hugged her, and began to cry.
You are all blubberers and understand nothing.”
“No, but she said that it was all over and that he’s now an
as I remember Nikólenka. Him—I just shut my eyes and remember,
“Oh, Natásha!” said Sónya, looking ecstatically and earnestly at
to say and as if she were saying it to someone else, with whom joking
and, whatever may happen to him or to me, shall never cease to love him
Natásha looked at Sónya with wondering and inquisitive eyes, and said
anything like it. She believed it could be, but did not understand it.
Sónya became thoughtful. The question of how to write to Nicholas, and
officer and a wounded hero, would it be right to remind him of herself
and, as it might seem, of the obligations to her he had taken on
“Well, I don’t know. It’s awkward and would make me ashamed.”
namesake, the new Count Bezúkhov) “and now she’s in love with that
tiptoe to the countess’ door and paused.
The count put his ear to the keyhole and listened.
then both voices together with glad intonations, and then footsteps.
of a surgeon who has just performed a difficult operation and admits the
countess, who sat holding in one hand the snuffbox with its portrait and
in the other the letter, and pressing them alternately to her lips.
bald head, over which she again looked at the letter and the portrait,
and in order to press them again to her lips, she slightly pushed away
the bald head. Véra, Natásha, Sónya, and Pétya now entered the room,
and the reading of the letter began. After a brief description of
the campaign and the two battles in which he had taken part, and his
promotion, Nicholas said that he kissed his father’s and mother’s
hands asking for their blessing, and that he kissed Véra, Natásha, and
Schoss, and his old nurse, and asked them to kiss for him “dear
Sónya, whom he loved and thought of just the same as ever.” When she
heard this Sónya blushed so that tears came into her eyes and, unable
and, flushed and smiling, plumped down on the floor. The countess was
should be glad and not cry.”
This was quite true, but the count, the countess, and Natásha looked
Nicholas’ letter was read over hundreds of times, and those who were
did not let it out of her hands. The tutors came, and the nurses, and
Dmítri, and several acquaintances, and the countess reread the letter
each time with fresh pleasure and each time discovered in it fresh
had first learned to say “pear” and then “granny,” that this son
should now be away in a foreign land amid strange surroundings, a manly
somewhere under her heart would ever cry, suck her breast, and begin to
this strong, brave man, this model son and officer that, judging by this
letters to Nicholas from all the household were written and copied out,
while under the supervision of the countess and the solicitude of the
count, money and all things necessary for the uniform and equipment
and her son. She had opportunities of sending her letters to the Grand
Duke Constantine Pávlovich, who commanded the Guards. The Rostóvs
and that if a letter reached the Grand Duke in command of the Guards
decided to send the letters and money by the Grand Duke’s courier to
Borís and Borís was to forward them to Nicholas. The letters were from
the old count, the countess, Pétya, Véra, Natásha, and Sónya, and
finally there were six thousand rubles for his outfit and various other
Russian and the Austrian. The Guards, just arrived from Russia, spent
the night ten miles from Olmütz and next morning were to come straight
Olmütz and that he wanted to see him as he had a letter and money for
after their active service, were stationed near Olmütz and the camp
swarmed with well-provisioned sutlers and Austrian Jews offering
celebrating awards they had received for the campaign, and made
Rostóv, who had just celebrated his promotion to a cornetcy and bought
Denísov’s horse, Bedouin, was in debt all round, to his comrades and
to Olmütz, dined there, drank a bottle of wine, and then set off alone
worn leather, and an officer’s saber with a sword knot. The Don horse
and he wore a crumpled hussar cap stuck jauntily back on one side of his
and all his comrades of the Guards by his appearance—that of a
their cleanliness and discipline. They had come by easy stages, their
knapsacks conveyed on carts, and the Austrian authorities had provided
had entered and left the town with their bands playing, and by the Grand
which the Guards prided themselves), the officers on foot and at their
proper posts. Borís had been quartered, and had marched all the
way, with Berg who was already in command of a company. Berg, who had
his superiors by his promptitude and accuracy and had arranged his money
acquaintance of many persons who might prove useful to him, and by
obtain a post on the commander in chief’s staff. Berg and Borís,
having rested after yesterday’s march, were sitting, clean and neatly
and watched his opponent’s face, evidently thinking about the game as
“We’ll try to,” replied Berg, touching a pawn and then removing
his hand.
nurse’s French, at which he and Borís used to laugh long ago.
Borís rose to meet Rostóv, but in doing so did not omit to steady and
that dread of beaten tracks, and wish to express itself in a manner
notwithstanding this, Borís embraced him in a quiet, friendly way and
They had not met for nearly half a year and, being at the age when young
those first steps. Both had changed greatly since they last met and both
“Oh, you damned dandies! Clean and fresh as if you’d been to a fete,
and with baritone notes in his voice, new to Borís, pointing to his own
mud-bespattered breeches. The German landlady, hearing Rostóv’s loud
fastened to the cording of his uniform and, indicating a bandaged arm,
rode with our regiment all the time, so that we had every comfort and
every advantage. What receptions we had in Poland! What dinners and
hussar revels and life in the fighting line, the other of the pleasures
and advantages of service under members of the Imperial family.
He went to his bed, drew a purse from under the clean pillow, and sent
“Yes, and I have some money and a letter to give you,” he added.
Rostóv took the letter and, throwing the money on the sofa, put both
arms on the table and began to read. After reading a few lines, he
letter from home and meet one of your own people whom you want to talk
everything over with, and I happen to be there, I’ll go at once, to
exclaimed, and immediately seizing him by the shoulder and looking
“Oh, don’t mention it, Count! I quite understand,” said Berg,
getting up and speaking in a muffled and guttural voice.
stood before a looking glass and brushed the hair on his temples
upwards, in the way affected by the Emperor Alexander, and, having
“Oh, what a pig I am, not to have written and to have given them
obtained through an acquaintance and sent to her son, asking him to take
it to its destination and make use of it.
“Why ‘What the devil’?” said Borís, picking it up and reading
“I want nothing, and I won’t be anyone’s adjutant.”
should much like to be an adjutant and not remain at the front.”
He looked intently and inquiringly into his friend’s eyes, evidently
“Well, send for him... and how do you get on with that German?”
“He is a very, very nice, honest, and pleasant fellow,” answered
Again Rostóv looked intently into Borís’ eyes and sighed. Berg
returned, and over the bottle of wine conversation between the three
officers became animated. The Guardsmen told Rostóv of their march and
how they had been made much of in Russia, Poland, and abroad. They spoke
of the sayings and doings of their commander, the Grand Duke, and told
stories of his kindness and irascibility. Berg, as usual, kept silent
stories of the Grand Duke’s quick temper he related with gusto how in
Galicia he had managed to deal with the Grand Duke when the latter
made a tour of the regiments and was annoyed at the irregularity of
a movement. With a pleasant smile Berg related how the Grand Duke
a rage) and called for the company commander.
Orders by heart and know the Regulations as well as I do the Lord’s
Prayer. So, Count, there never is any negligence in my company, and
so my conscience was at ease. I came forward....” (Berg stood up and
showed how he presented himself, with his hand to his cap, and really
it would have been difficult for a face to express greater respect and
is, stormed and stormed and stormed! It was not a matter of life but
rather of death, as the saying is. ‘Albanians!’ and ‘devils!’
and ‘To Siberia!’” said Berg with a sagacious smile. “I knew I
Count,” said Berg, lighting his pipe and emitting rings of smoke.
But Borís noticed that he was preparing to make fun of Berg, and
skillfully changed the subject. He asked him to tell them how and where
he got his wound. This pleased Rostóv and he began talking about it,
and as he went on became more and more animated. He told them of his
as they have heard it described by others, and as sounds well, but not
at all as it really was. Rostóv was a truthful young man and would on
and inevitably he lapsed into falsehood. If he had told the truth to his
hearers—who like himself had often heard stories of attacks and had
formed a definite idea of what an attack was and were expecting to hear
to him. He could not tell them simply that everyone went at a trot and
that he fell off his horse and sprained his arm and then ran as hard as
and young people are rarely capable of it. His hearers expected a story
of how beside himself and all aflame with excitement, he had flown like
a storm at the square, cut his way in, slashed right and left, how his
saber had tasted flesh and he had fallen exhausted, and so on. And so he
and being well disposed toward Borís, who had managed to please him the
hoping to find him alone. When he came in and saw an hussar of the line
half-closed eyes he looked at Rostóv, bowed slightly and wearily, and
was evidently one, Rostóv felt confused, blushed, and became silent.
Borís inquired what news there might be on the staff, and what, without
give no opinion on such an important government order, and Berg laughed
“we will talk of it later” (and he looked round at Rostóv). “Come
to me after the review and we will do what is possible.”
anger he did not condescend to notice, and said: “I think you were
Bolkónski noticed the hussar’s state of mind, and it amused him. With
and particularly amiable smile.
A strange feeling of exasperation and yet of respect for this man’s
“I am not talking about you,” he said, “I don’t know you and,
quiet authority, “you wish to insult me, and I am ready to agree with
self-respect, but admit that the time and place are very badly chosen.
In a day or two we shall all have to take part in a greater and more
serious duel, and besides, Drubetskóy, who says he is an old friend
displease you. However,” he added rising, “you know my name and
or you as having been at all insulted, and as a man older than you, my
and with a bow to them both he went out.
ordered his horse at once and, coldly taking leave of Borís, rode
home. Should he go to headquarters next day and challenge that affected
seeing the fright of that small and frail but proud man when covered by
his pistol, and then he felt with surprise that of all the men he knew
Austrian and Russian troops, both those freshly arrived from Russia and
the Russian with his heir the Tsarévich, and the Austrian with the
Archduke, inspected the allied army of eighty thousand men.
on the field before the fortress. Now thousands of feet and bayonets
moved and halted at the officers’ command, turned with banners flying,
formed up at intervals, and wheeled round other similar masses of
hoofs and the jingling of showy cavalry in blue, red, and green braided
uniforms, with smartly dressed bandsmen in front mounted on black, roan,
polished shining cannon that quivered on the gun carriages and with
infantry and cavalry and took up its appointed position. Not only the
in to the utmost, their red necks squeezed into their stiff collars, and
wearing scarves and all their decorations, not only the elegant, pomaded
officers, but every soldier with his freshly washed and shaven face and
his weapons clean and polished to the utmost, and every horse groomed
till its coat shone like satin and every hair of its wetted mane lay
smooth—felt that no small matter was happening, but an important and
solemn affair. Every general and every soldier was conscious of his own
insignificance, aware of being but a drop in that ocean of men, and
From early morning strenuous activities and efforts had begun and by ten
cavalry in front, behind it the artillery, and behind that again the
those recently arrived from Russia, both Guards and regiments of the
line; and the Austrian troops. But they all stood in the same lines,
under one command, and in a like order.
They’re coming!” Alarmed voices were heard, and a stir of final
lances and the unfolded standards fluttered against their staffs. It
repeated by others from various sides and all became silent.
was the Emperors’ suites. The Emperors rode up to the flank, and the
Alexander was clearly heard. He gave the words of greeting, and the
first regiment roared “Hurrah!” so deafeningly, continuously, and
joyfully that the men themselves were awed by their multitude and the
Rostóv, standing in the front lines of Kutúzov’s army which the Tsar
might, and a passionate attraction to him who was the cause of this
He felt that at a single word from that man all this vast mass (and he
himself an insignificant atom in it) would go through fire and water,
commit crime, die, or perform deeds of highest heroism, and so he could
not but tremble and his heart stand still at the imminence of that word.
after another greeting the Tsar with the strains of the march, and then
“Hurrah!”... Then the general march, and again “Hurrah! Hurrah!”
growing ever stronger and fuller and merging into a deafening roar.
Till the Tsar reached it, each regiment in its silence and immobility
already passed. Through the terrible and deafening roar of those voices,
amid the square masses of troops standing motionless as if turned to
symmetrically and above all freely, and in front of them two men—the
The handsome young Emperor Alexander, in the uniform of the Horse
Guards, wearing a cocked hat with its peaks front and back, with his
pleasant face and resonant though not loud voice, attracted everyone’s
Rostóv was not far from the trumpeters, and with his keen sight had
recognized the Tsar and watched his approach. When he was within twenty
paces, and Nicholas could clearly distinguish every detail of his
handsome, happy young face, he experienced a feeling of tenderness
and ecstasy such as he had never before known. Every trait and every
to the Austrian Emperor and smiled.
Seeing that smile, Rostóv involuntarily smiled himself and felt a still
some way and knowing that this was impossible was ready to cry. The Tsar
called the colonel of the regiment and said a few words to him.
“You have earned the St. George’s standards and will be worthy of
The Tsar said something more which Rostóv did not hear, and the
this indecision appeared to him majestic and enchanting, like everything
mare he rode, his hand in a white glove gathered up the reins, and he
Farther and farther he rode away, stopping at other regiments, till at
his horse indolently and carelessly. Rostóv recalled their quarrel of
yesterday and the question presented itself whether he ought or ought
love, such rapture, and such self-sacrifice, what do any of our quarrels
and affronts matter? I love and forgive everybody now.”
a ceremonial march past him, and Rostóv on Bedouin, recently purchased
alone and in full view of the Emperor.
Bedouin twice and successfully put him to the showy trot in which the
upon him, passed splendidly, lifting his feet with a high and graceful
Rostóv himself, his legs well back and his stomach drawn in and feeling
When the review was over, the newly arrived officers, and also
Kutúzov’s, collected in groups and began to talk about the awards,
about the Austrians and their uniforms, about their lines, about
Bonaparte, and how badly the latter would fare now, especially if the
Essen corps arrived and Prussia took our side.
But the talk in every group was chiefly about the Emperor Alexander. His
every word and movement was described with ecstasy.
enemy under the Emperor’s command. Commanded by the Emperor himself
Rostóv and most of the officers after the review.
The day after the review, Borís, in his best uniform and with his
Bolkónski, wishing to profit by his friendliness and obtain for himself
“It is all very well for Rostóv, whose father sends him ten thousand
rubles at a time, to talk about not wishing to cringe to anybody and not
make a career and must not miss opportunities, but must avail myself of
the town where the headquarters and the diplomatic corps were stationed
and the two Emperors were living with their suites, households, and
He knew no one, and despite his smart Guardsman’s uniform, all these
with their plumes, ribbons, and medals, both courtiers and military
aware of his existence. At the quarters of the commander in chief,
Kutúzov, where he inquired for Bolkónski, all the adjutants and even
great many officers like him were always coming there and that everybody
it, next day, November 15, after dinner he again went to Olmütz and,
Andrew was in and Borís was shown into a large hall probably formerly
used for dancing, but in which five beds now stood, and furniture of
various kinds: a table, chairs, and a clavichord. One adjutant, nearest
and whom Borís addressed turned round crossly and told him Bolkónski
was on duty and that he should go through the door on the left into the
reception room if he wished to see him. Borís thanked him and went to
the reception room, where he found some ten officers and generals.
when he wished to speak contemptuously, and noticing Borís, Prince
him to hear something more, nodded and turned to him with a cheerful
in the army, besides the subordination and discipline prescribed in the
military code, which he and the others knew in the regiment, there was
Guards. Prince Andrew came up to him and took his hand.
blushing—“of asking the commander in chief. He has had a letter from
“Only let me report this gentleman’s business, and I shall be at
say to the adjutant that Borís felt uncomfortable. He turned away and
waited impatiently for Prince Andrew’s return from the commander in
clavichord was. “It’s no use your going to the commander in chief.
us aides-de-camp and adjutants! But this is what we’ll do: I have
a good friend, an adjutant general and an excellent fellow, Prince
Dolgorúkov; and though you may not know it, the fact is that now
Kutúzov with his staff and all of us count for nothing. Everything is
go there anyhow and I have already spoken to him about you. We shall
man and help him to worldly success. Under cover of obtaining help
himself, he kept in touch with the circle which confers success and
which attracted him. He very readily took up Borís’ cause and went
occupied by the Emperors and their retinues.
the Hofkriegsrath and both Emperors took part. At that council, contrary
to the views of the old generals Kutúzov and Prince Schwartzenberg, it
had been decided to advance immediately and give battle to Bonaparte.
delay and advised waiting for something else before advancing had been
so completely silenced and their arguments confuted by such conclusive
at the council—the coming battle and the victory that would certainly
locality was known and shown in every detail on the maps, and Bonaparte,
returned from the council, tired and exhausted but eager and proud
protégé, but Prince Dolgorúkov politely and firmly pressing his hand
said nothing to Borís and, evidently unable to suppress the thoughts
fellow,” he said abruptly and eagerly, “I must confess to having
been unjust to the Austrians and especially to Weyrother. What
“What can he say? Tra-di-ri-di-ra and so on... merely to gain time.
I tell you he is in our hands, that’s certain! But what was most
and of course not as ‘Emperor,’ it seemed to me it should be to
“But between not recognizing him as Emperor and calling him General
addressing him as ‘Usurper and Enemy of Mankind.’”
address. He is a wise and clever fellow.”
present Emperor—more than once in Paris, and tells me he never met a
adroitness and Italian play-acting! Do you know the tale about him and
Count Markóv? Count Markóv was the only man who knew how to handle
him. You know the story of the handkerchief? It is delightful!”
purposely dropped a handkerchief in front of him and stood looking
at Markóv, probably expecting Markóv to pick it up for him, and how
Markóv immediately dropped his own beside it and picked it up without
“Oh, what a nuisance,” said Dolgorúkov, getting up hurriedly and
pressing the hands of Prince Andrew and Borís. “You know I should
be very glad to do all in my power both for you and for this dear young
man.” Again he pressed the hand of the latter with an expression of
good-natured, sincere, and animated levity. “But you see... another
obedient, and insignificant atom. They followed Prince Dolgorúkov out
into the corridor and met—coming out of the door of the Emperor’s
with a clever face and sharply projecting jaw which, without spoiling
his face, gave him a peculiar vivacity and shiftiness of expression.
This short man nodded to Dolgorúkov as to an intimate friend and stared
at Prince Andrew with cool intensity, walking straight toward him and
did neither: a look of animosity appeared on his face and the other
turned away and went down the side of the corridor.
Next day, the army began its campaign, and up to the very battle of
again and remained for a while with the Ismáylov regiment.
which Nicholas Rostóv served and which was in Prince Bagratión’s
into action as arranged, and after going behind other columns for
Cossacks and then the first and second squadrons of hussars and infantry
battalions and artillery pass by and go forward and then Generals
Bagratión and Dolgorúkov ride past with their adjutants. All the fear
remained in reserve and Nicholas Rostóv spent that day in a dull and
wretched mood. At nine in the morning, he heard firing in front and
shouts of hurrah, and saw wounded being brought back (there were not
many of them), and at last he saw how a whole detachment of French
affair was over and, though not big, had been a successful engagement.
The men and officers returning spoke of a brilliant victory, of the
occupation of the town of Wischau and the capture of a whole French
squadron. The day was bright and sunny after a sharp night frost, and
officers, generals, and adjutants, as they passed Rostóv going or
precedes a battle and had spent that happy day in inactivity, was all
Denísov, who had settled down by the roadside with a flask and some
The officers gathered round Denísov’s canteen, eating and talking.
The officers got up and stood round the Cossacks and their prisoner.
accent. He was breathless with agitation, his face was red, and when
And at every word he added: “But don’t hurt my little horse!” and
was. Now he excused himself for having been taken prisoner and now,
discipline and zeal in the service. He brought with him into our
The Cossacks sold the horse for two gold pieces, and Rostóv, being the
to Rostóv when the animal was handed over to the hussar.
Rostóv smilingly reassured the dragoon and gave him money.
All began to run and bustle, and Rostóv saw coming up the road behind
Rostóv did not know or remember how he ran to his place and mounted.
Instantly his regret at not having been in action and his dejected mood
meeting arrives. Not daring to look round and without looking round, he
near everything grew brighter, more joyful, more significant, and more
festive around him. Nearer and nearer to Rostóv came that sun shedding
beams of mild and majestic light around, and already he felt himself
and majestic voice that was yet so simple! And as if in accord with
The Emperor drew level with Rostóv and halted. Alexander’s face was
shone with such gaiety and youth, such innocent youth, that it suggested
the liveliness of a fourteen-year-old boy, and yet it was the face
Emperor’s eyes met Rostóv’s and rested on them for not more than
foot, and galloped on.
battle and, in spite of the remonstrances of his courtiers, at twelve
o’clock left the third column with which he had been and galloped
represented as a brilliant victory over the French, and so the
Emperor and the whole army, especially while the smoke hung over
the battlefield, believed that the French had been defeated and were
Emperor’s arrival, lay several killed and wounded soldiers whom there
of officers and courtiers, was riding a bobtailed chestnut mare, a
different one from that which he had ridden at the review, and bending
to one side he gracefully held a gold lorgnette to his eyes and looked
wounded soldier was so dirty, coarse, and revolting that his proximity
and how the well-trained horse looked round unconcerned and did not
apparently suffering more than the dying soldier, and he rode away.
Rostóv saw tears filling the Emperor’s eyes and heard him, as he was
vanguard, rewards were promised, and the men received a double ration of
vodka. The campfires crackled and the soldiers’ songs resounded
promotion to the rank of major, and Rostóv, who had already drunk
said he, “but the health of our Sovereign, that good, enchanting, and
great man! Let us drink to his health and to the certain defeat of the
saying it right, I have drunk a good deal—but that is how I feel, and
so do you too! To the health of Alexander the First! Hurrah!”
And the old cavalry captain, Kírsten, shouted enthusiastically and no
When the officers had emptied and smashed their glasses, Kírsten filled
others and, in shirt sleeves and breeches, went glass in hand to the
soldiers’ bonfires and with his long gray mustache, his white chest
“Lads! here’s to our Sovereign, the Emperor, and victory over
The hussars crowded round and responded heartily with loud shouts.
Late that night, when all had separated, Denísov with his short hand
“I believe it, I believe it, fwiend, and I share and appwove...”
“No, you don’t understand!”
And Rostóv got up and went wandering among the campfires, dreaming of
eyes. He really was in love with the Tsar and the glory of the Russian
arms and the hope of future triumph. And he was not the only man to
love, though less ecstatically, with their Tsar and the glory of the
The next day the Emperor stopped at Wischau, and Villier, his physician,
was repeatedly summoned to see him. At headquarters and among the troops
near by the news spread that the Emperor was unwell. He ate nothing and
the sight of the killed and wounded.
a flag of truce, demanding an audience with the Russian Emperor, was
Emperor had only just fallen asleep and so Savary had to wait. At midday
he was admitted to the Emperor, and an hour later he rode off with
It was rumored that Savary had been sent to propose to Alexander
a meeting with Napoleon. To the joy and pride of the whole army, a
personal interview was refused, and instead of the Sovereign, Prince
Toward evening Dolgorúkov came back, went straight to the Tsar, and
On the eighteenth and nineteenth of November, the army advanced two
days’ march and the enemy’s outposts after a brief interchange
and fro, and dispatching of adjutants—was confined to the Emperor’s
Kutúzov’s headquarters and the staffs of the commanders of columns.
By evening, the adjutants had spread it to all ends and parts of the
army, and in the night from the nineteenth to the twentieth, the whole
eighty thousand allied troops rose from their bivouacs to the hum of
voices, and the army swayed and started in one enormous mass six miles
headquarters in the morning and had started the whole movement that
clock. One wheel slowly moved, another was set in motion, and a third,
and wheels began to revolve faster and faster, levers and cogwheels to
work, chimes to play, figures to pop out, and the hands to advance with
machine, an impulse once given leads to the final result; and just as
reached. Wheels creak on their axles as the cogs engage one another and
neighboring wheel is as quiet and motionless as though it were prepared
catches it and obeying the impulse that wheel begins to creak and joins
in the common motion the result and aim of which are beyond its ken.
wheels and pulleys is merely a slow and regular movement of the
hands which show the time, so the result of all the complicated human
activities of 160,000 Russians and French—all their passions, desires,
remorse, humiliations, sufferings, outbursts of pride, fear, and
of the hand on the dial of human history.
Prince Andrew was on duty that day and in constant attendance on the
commander in chief.
and after staying but a short time with the Tsar went to see the grand
and dissatisfied about something and that at headquarters they were
dissatisfied with him, and also that at the Emperor’s headquarters
“But they heard him at the council of war and will hear him when he
talks sense, but to temporize and wait for something now when Bonaparte
“Yes, I saw him, and am convinced that he fears nothing so much as
interview? Why negotiate, and above all why retreat, when to retreat is
me! That’s the sort of man he is, and nothing more,” replied
should be a nice set of fellows if we were to wait about and so give him
our hands! No, we mustn’t forget Suvórov and his rule—not to put
outposts today and it is impossible to say where his chief forces are
“Oh, that is all the same,” Dolgorúkov said quickly, and getting up
If he is standing before Brünn...”
Prince Andrew began to reply and to state his own plan, which might
to demonstrate the defects of the latter and the merits of his own plan,
Prince Dolgorúkov ceased to listen to him and gazed absent-mindedly not
till then, had listened with an amused smile to their conversation and
Kutúzov, there is not a single Russian in command of a column! The
commanders are: Herr General Wimpfen, le Comte de Langeron, le Prince de
Lichtenstein, le Prince, de Hohenlohe, and finally Prishprish, and so on
are now two Russians, Milorádovich, and Dokhtúrov, and there would be
Andrew. “I wish you good luck and success, gentlemen!” he added and
went out after shaking hands with Dolgorúkov and Bilíbin.
Kutúzov looked sternly at his adjutant and, after a pause, replied:
“I think the battle will be lost, and so I told Count Tolstóy and
dear general, I am engaged with rice and cutlets, look after military
held. All the commanders of columns were summoned to the commander in
chief’s and with the exception of Prince Bagratión, who declined to
eagerness and briskness presented a marked contrast to the dissatisfied
and drowsy Kutúzov, who reluctantly played the part of chairman and
line to reconnoiter personally, and twice to the Emperors, Russian and
Austrian, to report and explain, and to his headquarters where he had
dictated the dispositions in German, and now, much exhausted, he arrived
commander in chief. He interrupted him, talked rapidly and indistinctly,
without looking at the man he was addressing, and did not reply to
questions put to him. He was bespattered with mud and had a pitiful,
weary, and distracted air, though at the same time he was haughty and
Ostralitz. In the large drawing room which had become the commander
in chief’s office were gathered Kutúzov himself, Weyrother, and the
members of the council of war. They were drinking tea, and only awaited
in to inform the commander in chief of this and, availing himself
Weyrother, hurriedly rising from his seat and going up to the table on
with his podgy old hands resting symmetrically on its arms. At the sound
“Yes, yes, if you please! It is already late,” said he, and nodding
his head he let it droop and again closed his eye.
followed proved that the commander in chief at that moment was absorbed
the gesture of a man too busy to lose a moment, glanced at Kutúzov and,
having convinced himself that he was asleep, took up a paper and in
“Dispositions for an attack on the enemy position behind Kobelnitz and
The dispositions were very complicated and difficult. They began as
“As the enemy’s left wing rests on wooded hills and his right
extends along Kobelnitz and Sokolnitz behind the ponds that are there,
while we, on the other hand, with our left wing by far outflank his
if we occupy the villages of Sokolnitz and Kobelnitz, whereby we
can both fall on his flank and pursue him over the plain between
Schlappanitz and the Thuerassa forest, avoiding the defiles of
Schlappanitz and Bellowitz which cover the enemy’s front. For this
column marches... The third column marches...” and so on, read
the wall, his eyes fixed on a burning candle, and seemed not to listen
with his glistening wide-open eyes fixed upon him and his mustache
elbows turned outwards, his hands on his knees, and his shoulders
and only turned away his eyes when the Austrian chief of staff finished
agreed or disagreed and was satisfied or not with the arrangements. Next
his head, and with inimical politeness lurking in the corners of his
Austrian general, continuing to read, frowned angrily and jerked his
good as to look at the map and listen.” Langeron lifted his eyes with
gaze drooped his eyes sadly and again took to twirling his snuffbox.
hand to his ear toward Weyrother, with the air of a man absorbed in
an assiduous and modest mien, and stooping over the outspread map
conscientiously studied the dispositions and the unfamiliar locality. He
and the difficult names of villages. Weyrother complied and Dohktúrov
brought his snuffbox to rest and, without looking at Weyrother or at
again, and let his head sink still lower.
attack instead of being attacked, and so render the whole of this
plan perfectly worthless. Weyrother met all objections with a firm and
contemptuous smile, evidently prepared beforehand to meet all objections
“He has forty thousand men at most,” replied Weyrother, with the
strange and ridiculous to meet objections from Russian generals and to
“The enemy has quenched his fires and a continual noise is heard from
the Thuerassa, he merely saves us a great deal of trouble and all our
Kutúzov here woke up, coughed heavily, and looked round at the
heard them, and we shall all do our duty. But before a battle, there is
He moved as if to rise. The generals bowed and retired. It was past
express his opinion as he had hoped to, left on him a vague and uneasy
impression. Whether Dolgorúkov and Weyrother, or Kutúzov, Langeron,
and the others who did not approve of the plan of attack, were
account of court and personal considerations tens of thousands of lives,
and my life, my life,” he thought, “must be risked?”
his last parting from his father and his wife; he remembered the days
when he first loved her. He thought of her pregnancy and felt sorry for
her and for himself, and in a nervously emotional and softened mood he
went out of the hut in which he was billeted with Nesvítski and began
to walk up and down before it.
The night was foggy and through the fog the moonlight gleamed
concentration of fighting at one point, and the hesitation of all the
commanders. And then that happy moment, that Toulon for which he had
so long waited, presents itself to him at last. He firmly and clearly
expresses his opinion to Kutúzov, to Weyrother, and to the Emperors.
the decisive point, and gains the victory alone. “But death and
answer that voice and went on dreaming of his triumphs. The dispositions
battle is won by him alone. Kutúzov is removed and he is appointed...
“Well and then?” asked the other voice. “If before that you are
what will happen and don’t want to know, and can’t, but if I want
is not my fault that I want it and want nothing but that and live only
what am I to do if I love nothing but fame and men’s esteem? Death,
wounds, the loss of family—I fear nothing. And precious and dear
me—yet dreadful and unnatural as it seems, I would give them all at
don’t know and never shall know, for the love of these men here,” he
and who was called Tit. He was saying, “Tit, I say, Tit!”
of the orderlies and servants.
“All the same, I love and value nothing but triumph over them all, I
value this mystic power and glory that is floating here above me in this
in couples and he himself rode along the line trying to master the
eyes kept closing, and in his fancy appeared—now the Emperor, now
Denísov, and now Moscow memories—and he again hurriedly opened his
eyes and saw close before him the head and ears of the horse he was
riding, and sometimes, when he came within six paces of them, the
“that the Emperor will meet me and give me an order as he would to any
other officer; he’ll say: ‘Go and find out what’s there.’ There
way and attaching him to himself! What if he gave me a place near him?
aroused him. He started and opened his eyes.
“Where am I? Oh yes, in the skirmishing line... pass and
now before I am off duty. I’ll take another turn and when I get back
I’ll go to the general and ask him.” He readjusted himself in the
saddle and touched up his horse to ride once more round his hussars. It
descent lit up, and facing it a black knoll that seemed as steep as a
to his horse’s mane and pulled up beside the hussar. He was succumbing
is that the Emperor is here. How he looked at me and wished to say
shouts of thousands of voices. His horse and the horse of the hussar
shouting came from, a fire flared up and went out again, then another,
and all along the French line on the hill fires flared up and the
shouting grew louder and louder. Rostóv could hear the sound of French
great; all he could hear was: “ahahah!” and “rrrr!”
pricking its ears at the noise and looking at the lights. The shouting
grew still louder and merged into a general roar that only an army
of several thousand men could produce. The lights spread farther and
The hussar only sighed without replying and coughed angrily. The sound
heard, and out of the foggy darkness the figure of a sergeant of hussars
Rostóv, still looking round toward the fires and the shouts, rode with
One was on a white horse. Prince Bagratión and Prince Dolgorúkov with
lights and shouts in the enemy’s camp. Rostóv rode up to Bagratión,
reported to him, and then joined the adjutants listening to what the
is nothing but a trick! He has retreated and ordered the rearguard to
kindle fires and make a noise to deceive us.”
Bagratión stopped and, before replying, tried to see Rostóv’s face
“Well, go and see,” he said, after a pause.
Rostóv spurred his horse, called to Sergeant Fédchenko and two other
hussars, told them to follow him, and trotted downhill in the direction
from which the shouting came. He felt both frightened and pleased to be
riding alone with three hussars into that mysterious and dangerous misty
him and did not stop but rode on and on, continually mistaking bushes
for trees and gullies for men and continually discovering his mistakes.
and distinctly. In the valley he saw before him something like a river,
cross it and ride over the black field up the hillside. To keep to the
crossed the road, and began riding up the hill at a gallop toward the
point where the French pickets had been standing that evening.
and a bullet whizzing high up in the mist with a plaintive sound passed
Rostóv turned his horse and galloped back. Four more reports followed
at intervals, and the bullets passed somewhere in the fog singing in
like his own, at the firing, and went back at a footpace. “Well, some
and with his hand at the salute rode up to the general.
Dolgorúkov was still insisting that the French had retreated and had
might retreat and leave the pickets.”
in the evening,” reported Rostóv, stooping forward with his hand at
the salute and unable to repress the smile of delight induced by his
ride and especially by the sound of the bullets.
The fires and shouting in the enemy’s army were occasioned by the fact
lit wisps of straw and ran after him, shouting, “Vive l’Empereur!”
Hollabrünn and have pursued ever since to this place. The position we
occupy is a strong one, and while they are marching to go round me on
valor carry disorder and confusion into the enemy’s ranks, but should
of England, inspired by such hatred of our nation! This victory will
conclude our campaign and we can return to winter quarters, where fresh
French troops who are being raised in France will join us, and the peace
I shall conclude will be worthy of my people, of you, and of myself.
center, the reserves, and Bagratión’s right flank had not yet moved,
but on the left flank the columns of infantry, cavalry, and artillery,
right flank and drive it into the Bohemian mountains according to plan,
were already up and astir. The smoke of the campfires, into which they
and dark. The officers were hurriedly drinking tea and breakfasting, the
soldiers, munching biscuit and beating a tattoo with their feet to
remains of sheds, chairs, tables, wheels, tubs, and everything that they
were moving in and out among the Russian troops and served as heralds
a commanding officer’s quarters, the regiment began to move: the
bags into the carts, got their muskets ready, and formed rank. The
officers buttoned up their coats, buckled on their swords and pouches,
and moved along the ranks shouting. The train drivers and orderlies
harnessed and packed the wagons and tied on the loads. The adjutants and
battalion and regimental commanders mounted, crossed themselves, gave
final instructions, orders, and commissions to the baggage men
who remained behind, and the monotonous tramp of thousands of feet
resounded. The column moved forward without knowing where and unable,
from the masses around them, the smoke and the increasing fog, to see
A soldier on the march is hemmed in and borne along by his regiment as
strange, unknown, and dangerous places he reaches, just as a sailor is
always surrounded by the same decks, masts, and rigging of his ship, so
same sergeant major Iván Mítrich, the same company dog Jack, and the
same commanders. The sailor rarely cares to know the latitude in which
his ship is sailing, but on the day of battle—heaven knows how and
and solemn, and awakening in the men an unusual curiosity. On the day of
regiment, they listen intently, look about, and eagerly ask concerning
not see ten paces ahead. Bushes looked like gigantic trees and level
ground like cliffs and slopes. Anywhere, on any side, one might
for a long time, always in the same fog, descending and ascending hills,
avoiding gardens and enclosures, going over new and unknown ground, and
aware that in front, behind, and on all sides, other Russian columns
night I looked at the campfires and there was no end of them. A regular
Though none of the column commanders rode up to the ranks or talked to
the men (the commanders, as we saw at the council of war, were out of
humor and dissatisfied with the affair, and so did not exert themselves
the greater part of the men had to halt and an unpleasant consciousness
of some dislocation and blunder spread through the ranks. How such
certainly is communicated very surely, and flows rapidly, imperceptibly,
and irrepressibly, as water does in a creek. Had the Russian army been
it was, the disorder was readily and naturally attributed to the stupid
Germans, and everyone was convinced that a dangerous muddle had been
“They were in a hurry enough to start us, and now here we stand in
behind. And now here we stand hungry.”
doing!” said the officer and rode off.
turn into vexation and anger at the stupid arrangements and at the
moving toward our left flank, the higher command found that our center
was too far separated from our right flank and the cavalry were all
ordered to turn back to the right. Several thousand cavalry crossed in
At the front an altercation occurred between an Austrian guide and a
Russian general. The general shouted a demand that the cavalry should be
halted, the Austrian argued that not he, but the higher command, was to
blame. The troops meanwhile stood growing listless and dispirited. After
were descending. In front in the fog a shot was heard and then another,
at first irregularly at varying intervals—trata...tat—and then more
and more regularly and rapidly, and the action at the Goldbach Stream
Not expecting to come on the enemy down by the stream, and having
commanders, and with a consciousness of being too late spreading through
the ranks, and above all being unable to see anything in front or around
lazily and advanced and again halted, receiving no timely orders from
the officers or adjutants who wandered about in the fog in those unknown
began for the first, second, and third columns, which had gone down into
a clear blue sky, and the sun’s vast orb quivered like a huge hollow,
army, and even Napoleon himself with his staff, were not on the far side
of the streams and hollows of Sokolnitz and Schlappanitz beyond which we
intended to take up our position and begin the action, but were on this
which seemed to rise out of the sea of mist and on which the Russian
troops were moving in the distance, and he listened to the sounds of
force had already descended into the valley toward the ponds and lakes
and part were leaving these Pratzen Heights which he intended to attack
and regarded as the key to the position. He saw over the mist that in
direction toward the valley and disappearing one after another into
sound of wheels and footsteps heard by the outposts during the night,
by the disorderly movement of the Russian columns, and from all
in front of them, and that the columns moving near Pratzen constituted
the center of the Russian army, and that that center was already
Before dawn he had slept for a few hours, and refreshed, vigorous, and
in good spirits, he mounted his horse and rode out into the field
in that happy mood in which everything seems possible and everything
the mist, and his cold face wore that special look of confident,
When the sun had entirely emerged from the fog, and fields and mist were
action—he drew the glove from his shapely white hand, made a sign
with it to the marshals, and ordered the action to begin. The marshals,
accompanied by adjutants, galloped off in different directions, and
toward those Pratzen Heights which were being more and more denuded by
Przebyszéwski’s and Langeron’s columns which had already gone down
into the valley. He greeted the men of the foremost regiment and gave
commander in chief’s suite. He was in a state of suppressed excitement
and irritation, though controlledly calm as a man is at the approach of
know, but he felt sure it would do so. The locality and the position of
Prince Andrew considered possible contingencies and formed new projects
such as might call for his rapidity of perception and decision.
concentrate. “There we shall encounter difficulties, and there,”
thought he, “I shall be sent with a brigade or division, and there,
standard in hand, I shall go forward and break whatever is in front of
He could not look calmly at the standards of the passing battalions.
Seeing them he kept thinking, “That may be the very standard with
our troops had descended and from whence came the sounds of firing.
Above the heights was the dark clear sky, and to the right the vast orb
some wooded hills were discernible, and it was there the enemy probably
entering the misty region with a sound of hoofs and wheels and now and
of cavalry came up and disappeared in the sea of mist. In front and
behind moved infantry. The commander in chief was standing at the end of
worn and irritable. The infantry passing before him came to a halt
without any command being given, apparently obstructed by something in
“Do order them to form into battalion columns and go round the
you understand, your excellency, my dear sir, that you must not
galloped up to Kutúzov and asked in the Emperor’s name had the fourth
Kutúzov turned round without answering and his eye happened to fall
malevolent and caustic expression softened, as if admitting that what
was being done was not his adjutant’s fault, and still not answering
“Go, my dear fellow, and see whether the third division has passed the
village. Tell it to stop and await my orders.”
the third division and convinced himself that there really were no
regiment was much surprised at the commander in chief’s order to throw
in front of him and that the enemy must be at least six miles away.
hidden by dense mist. Having given orders in the commander in chief’s
“All right, all right!” he said to Prince Andrew, and turned to a
general who, watch in hand, was saying it was time they started as all
saluting, and this sound rapidly came nearer along the whole extended
of which Kutúzov was standing began to shout, he rode a little to one
side and looked round with a frown. Along the road from Pratzen galloped
soldier at the front, gave the command “Attention!” and rode up
to the Emperors with a salute. His whole appearance and manner were
Alexander unpleasantly, he rode up and saluted.
This unpleasant impression merely flitted over the young and happy face
of the Emperor like a cloud of haze across a clear sky and vanished.
there was still the same bewitching combination of majesty and mildness
in his fine gray eyes, and on his delicate lips the same capacity for
varying expression and the same prevalent appearance of goodhearted
brighter and more energetic. He was slightly flushed after galloping two
miles, and reining in his horse he sighed restfully and looked round
at the faces of his suite, young and animated as his own. Czartorýski,
Novosíltsev, Prince Volkónsky, Strógonov, and the others, all richly
heated horses, exchanging remarks and smiling, had stopped behind the
erect on his handsome black horse, looking about him in a leisurely and
preoccupied manner. He beckoned to one of his white adjutants and asked
Guard and line regiments, Russian and Austrian. Among them were grooms
a stuffy room, so a whiff of youthfulness, energy, and confidence of
Emperor Alexander hurriedly to Kutúzov, glancing courteously at the
rather round shoulders and glanced at Novosíltsev who was near him, as
Emperor Francis continued to look about him and did not listen.
heard, and again something in his face twitched—“That is just why
I do not begin, sire, because we are not on parade and not on the
Empress’ Field,” said he clearly and distinctly.
dissatisfaction and reproach. “Old though he may be, he should not, he
The Tsar looked intently and observantly into Kutúzov’s eye
“However, if you command it, Your Majesty,” said Kutúzov, lifting
his head and again assuming his former tone of a dull, unreasoning, but
He touched his horse and having called Milorádovich, the commander of
The troops again began to move, and two battalions of the Nóvgorod and
without his greatcoat, with his Orders on his breast and an enormous
and back, galloped strenuously forward, and with a dashing salute reined
Milorádovich wheeled his horse sharply and stationed himself a little
passed in step before the Emperors and their suites at a bold, brisk
“Lads!” shouted Milorádovich in a loud, self-confident, and cheery
battle, and by the sight of the gallant Ápsherons, his comrades in
field of Austerlitz, enduring the heedless blows of his left foot and
Empress’ Field, not understanding the significance of the firing, nor
being said, thought, and felt that day by its rider.
The Emperor turned with a smile to one of his followers and made a
inn, where two roads parted. Both of them led downhill and troops were
The fog had begun to clear and enemy troops were already dimly visible
about a mile and a half off on the opposite heights. Down below, on
the left, the firing became more distinct. Kutúzov had stopped and was
The two generals and the adjutant took hold of the field glass, trying
mile and a half away, but had suddenly and unexpectedly appeared just in
than five hundred paces from where Kutúzov was standing, a dense French
thought Prince Andrew, and striking his horse he rode up to Kutúzov.
quite close at hand, and a voice of naïve terror barely two steps from
at a command, everyone began to run.
Confused and ever-increasing crowds were running back to where five
touch with it, and looked around bewildered and unable to grasp what was
happening in front of him. Nesvítski with an angry face, red and unlike
place and without answering drew out a handkerchief. Blood was flowing
handkerchief to his wounded cheek and pointing to the fleeing soldiers.
“Stop them!” he shouted, and at the same moment, probably realizing
that it was impossible to stop them, spurred his horse and rode to the
A fresh wave of the flying mob caught him and bore him back with it.
Why are you hindering us?” Another in the same place turned round and
and Frenchmen running toward it. Higher up stood some Russian infantry,
fleeing crowd. A mounted general separated himself from the infantry and
all pale and exchanged looks in silence.
“Stop those wretches!” gasped Kutúzov to the regimental commander,
him for those words, bullets flew hissing across the regiment and across
The French had attacked the battery and, seeing Kutúzov, were firing
at him. After this volley the regimental commander clutched at his leg;
several soldiers fell, and a second lieutenant who was holding the
flag let it fall from his hands. It swayed and fell, but caught on the
“Oh! Oh! Oh!” groaned Kutúzov despairingly and looked around....
the disordered battalion and at the enemy, “what’s that?”
shame and anger choking him, had already leapt from his horse and run to
the standard.
“Here it is!” thought he, seizing the staff of the standard and
“Hurrah!” shouted Prince Andrew, and, scarcely able to hold up
the heavy standard, he ran forward with full confidence that the whole
And really he only ran a few steps alone. One soldier moved and then
another and soon the whole battalion ran forward shouting “Hurrah!”
and overtook him. A sergeant of the battalion ran up and took the flag
that was swaying from its weight in Prince Andrew’s hands, but he
was immediately killed. Prince Andrew again seized the standard and,
artillerymen, some of whom were fighting, while others, having abandoned
soldiers who were seizing the artillery horses and turning the guns
round. Prince Andrew and the battalion were already within twenty paces
of the cannon. He heard the whistle of bullets above him unceasingly and
to right and left of him soldiers continually groaned and dropped. But
Frenchman remembers his bayonet and stabs him....”
the struggling men, and the fate of the red-haired gunner, who had
triumphantly secured the mop and still did not realize what awaited him,
it was that the pain distracted him and prevented his seeing what he had
and fell on his back. He opened his eyes, hoping to see how the struggle
had been killed or not and whether the cannon had been captured or
clouds gliding slowly across it. “How quiet, peaceful, and solemn; not
and fighting, not at all as the gunner and the Frenchman with frightened
and angry faces struggled for the mop: how differently do those clouds
quiet and peace. Thank God!...”
On our right flank commanded by Bagratión, at nine o’clock the battle
had not yet begun. Not wishing to agree to Dolgorúkov’s demand to
commence the action, and wishing to avert responsibility from himself,
commander in chief. Bagratión knew that as the distance between the two
(which he very likely would be), and found the commander in chief
and the boyish face Rostóv, breathless with excitement and hope, was
“And if I should meet His Majesty before I meet the commander in
chief, your excellency?” said Rostóv, with his hand to his cap.
hours’ sleep before morning and felt cheerful, bold, and resolute,
with elasticity of movement, faith in his good fortune, and generally in
that state of mind which makes everything seem possible, pleasant, and
orderly to the bravest general, and still more, he was going with a
was bright, he had a good horse under him, and his heart was full of
joy and happiness. On receiving the order he gave his horse the rein
and galloped along the line. At first he rode along the line of
standing motionless; then he came to the region occupied by Uvárov’s
cavalry and here he noticed a stir and signs of preparation for battle;
and musketry ahead of him. The firing grew louder and louder.
down the hillsides, and clouds of cannon smoke rolling, spreading,
and mingling with one another. He could also, by the gleam of bayonets
visible through the smoke, make out moving masses of infantry and narrow
going on, but strain his attention as he would he could not understand
some sort were moving about, in front and behind moved lines of troops;
but why, whither, and who they were, it was impossible to make out.
These sights and sounds had no depressing or intimidating effect on him;
on the contrary, they stimulated his energy and determination.
and again proceeded to gallop along the line, penetrating farther and
He was riding almost along the front line. A handful of men came
involuntarily noticed that one of them was bleeding, and galloped on.
uniforms, mounted on black horses, trotting straight toward him and
way of these men, and he would have got clear had they continued at the
and the jingle of their weapons and saw their horses, their figures, and
even their faces, more and more distinctly. They were our Horse Guards,
Rostóv could already see their faces and heard the command:
This Guardsman would certainly have bowled Rostóv and his Bedouin over
(Rostóv felt himself quite tiny and weak compared to these gigantic men
and horses) had it not occurred to Rostóv to flourish his whip before
hands high, shied, throwing back its ears; but the pockmarked Guardsman
drove his huge spurs in violently, and the horse, flourishing its tail
and extending its neck, galloped on yet faster. Hardly had the Horse
Guards passed Rostóv before he heard them shout, “Hurrah!” and
more, for immediately afterwards cannon began firing from somewhere and
of all that mass of huge and handsome men, of all those brilliant,
rich youths, officers and cadets, who had galloped past him on their
thousand-ruble horses, only eighteen were left after the charge.
“Why should I envy them? My chance is not lost, and maybe I shall see
the Emperor immediately!” thought Rostóv and galloped on.
When he came level with the Foot Guards he noticed that about them and
the soldiers’ faces and unnatural warlike solemnity on those of the
“Can you imagine it?” and he began describing how the Guards, having
taken up their position and seeing troops before them, thought they were
Austrians, and all at once discovered from the cannon balls discharged
by those troops that they were themselves in the front line and had
Highness,” and pointing to the Grand Duke who with his high shoulders
and frowning brows stood a hundred paces away from them in his helmet
and Horse Guards’ jacket, shouting something to a pale, white
“But that’s the Grand Duke, and I want the commander in chief or the
Emperor,” said Rostóv, and was about to spur his horse.
as Borís. “Count! I am wounded in my right hand” (and he showed his
bleeding hand with a handkerchief tied round it) “and I remained at
the front. I held my sword in my left hand, Count. All our family—the
He said something more, but Rostóv did not wait to hear it and rode
Having passed the Guards and traversed an empty space, Rostóv, to avoid
where the hottest musket fire and cannonade were heard. Suddenly he
heard musket fire quite close in front of him and behind our troops,
and for the issue of the whole battle. “But be that what it may,”
commander in chief here, and if all is lost it is for me to perish with
The foreboding of evil that had suddenly come over Rostóv was more and
firing?” Rostóv kept asking as he came up to Russian and Austrian
he was told in Russian, German, and Czech by the crowd of fugitives who
Several wounded men passed along the road, and words of abuse, screams,
and groans mingled in a general hubbub, then the firing died down.
Rostóv learned later that Russian and Austrian soldiers had been firing
handful of scoundrels. It will soon be over, it can’t be that, it
The idea of defeat and flight could not enter Rostóv’s head. Though
he saw French cannon and French troops on the Pratzen Heights just where
he had been ordered to look for the commander in chief, he could not,
Rostóv had been ordered to look for Kutúzov and the Emperor near the
village of Pratzen. But neither they nor a single commanding officer
sorts, and Russian and Austrian soldiers of all arms, some wounded and
some not. This whole mass droned and jostled in confusion under the
laughing for some reason and shaking himself free.
horse of a batman or groom of some important personage and began to
carriage at full speed about an hour before along that very road and
horses and Ilyá Iványch. I don’t think Ilyá drives anyone except
Rostóv let go of the horse and was about to ride on, when a wounded
“Who is it you want?” he asked. “The commander in chief? He was
not many left alive. Go that way, to that village, all the commanders
and he walked on.
he saw turrets and a church. What need to hurry? What was he now to say
to the Tsar or to Kutúzov, even if they were alive and unwounded?
Rostóv considered, and then went in the direction where they said he
yet occupied that region, and the Russians—the uninjured and slightly
manure on well-kept plowland, lay from ten to fifteen dead and wounded
to each couple of acres. The wounded crept together in twos and threes
and one could hear their distressing screams and groans, sometimes
avoid seeing all these suffering men, and he felt afraid—afraid not
for his life, but for the courage he needed and which he knew would not
stand the sight of these unfortunates.
The French, who had ceased firing at this field strewn with dead and
riding over it trained a gun on him and fired several shots. The
sensation of those terrible whistling sounds and of the corpses around
him merged in Rostóv’s mind into a single feeling of terror and pity
disordered. The French cannon did not reach there and the musketry fire
sounded far away. Here everyone clearly saw and said that the battle
correct, others that it was not, and explained the false rumor that had
from the field of battle with the pale and terrified Ober-Hofmarschal
from headquarters behind the village to the left, and thither Rostóv
he had ridden about two miles and had passed the last of the Russian
horse with his spurs, and giving it the rein leaped lightly over. Only
Turning the horse sharply, he again jumped the ditch, and deferentially
to Rostóv and involuntarily riveted his attention, made a gesture of
refusal with his head and hand and by that gesture Rostóv instantly
recognized his lamented and adored monarch.
thought Rostóv. At that moment Alexander turned his head and Rostóv
Emperor was pale, his cheeks sunken and his eyes hollow, but the charm,
false. He was happy to be seeing him. He knew that he might and even
ought to go straight to him and give the message Dolgorúkov had ordered
But as a youth in love trembles, is unnerved, and dares not utter the
chance of delay and flight when the longed-for moment comes and he is
the Emperor, and a thousand reasons occurred to him why it would be
inconvenient, unseemly, and impossible to do so.
his being alone and despondent! A strange face may seem unpleasant or
now, when my heart fails me and my mouth feels dry at the mere sight
most part to be spoken at a moment of victory and triumph, generally
when he was dying of wounds and the sovereign had thanked him for heroic
deeds, and while dying he expressed the love his actions had proved.
flank now that it is nearly four o’clock and the battle is lost?
reflections. Better die a thousand times than risk receiving an unkind
look or bad opinion from him,” Rostóv decided; and sorrowfully and
While Rostóv was thus arguing with himself and riding sadly away,
Captain von Toll chanced to ride to the same spot, and seeing the
Emperor at once rode up to him, offered his services, and assisted him
to cross the ditch on foot. The Emperor, wishing to rest and feeling
unwell, sat down under an apple tree and von Toll remained beside him.
Rostóv from a distance saw with envy and remorse how von Toll spoke
long and warmly to the Emperor and how the Emperor, evidently weeping,
covered his eyes with his hand and pressed von Toll’s hand.
“And I might have been in his place!” thought Rostóv, and hardly
was a unique chance to show his devotion to the Emperor and he had not
round and galloped back to the place where he had seen the Emperor, but
there was no one beyond the ditch now. Only some carts and carriages
horses in horsecloths. Then came a cart, and behind that walked an old,
bandy-legged domestic serf in a peaked cap and sheepskin coat.
in silence, and then the same joke was repeated.
than a hundred cannon were already in the hands of the French.
Przebyszéwski and his corps had laid down their arms. Other columns
The remains of Langeron’s and Dokhtúrov’s mingled forces were
crowding around the dams and banks of the ponds near the village of
In the rearguard, Dokhtúrov and others rallying some battalions kept up
angling, while his grandson, with shirt sleeves rolled up, handled the
so many years Moravians in shaggy caps and blue jackets had peacefully
driven their two-horse carts loaded with wheat and had returned dusty
and the cannon, under the horses’ hoofs and between the wagon wheels,
another, dying, stepping over the dying and killing one another, only to
move on a few steps and be killed themselves in the same way.
a shell burst in the midst of that dense throng, killing some and
Dólokhov—now an officer—wounded in the arm, and on foot, with
the regimental commander on horseback and some ten men of his company,
crowd, they had got wedged in at the approach to the dam and, jammed in
cannon and the crowd were dragging it out. A cannon ball killed someone
behind them, another fell in front and splashed Dólokhov with blood.
steps, and again stopped.
“Move on a hundred yards and we are certainly saved, remain here
another two minutes and it is certain death,” thought each one.
of the dam, throwing two soldiers off their feet, and ran onto the
The ice bore him but it swayed and creaked, and it was plain that it
under his weight alone. The men looked at him and pressed to the
entrance to the dam raised his hand and opened his mouth to address
everyone ducked. It flopped into something moist, and the general fell
The ice gave way under one of the foremost soldiers, and one leg slipped
near the gun waved their arms and beat the horses to make them turn and
those on foot, collapsed in a great mass, and some forty men who were on
it dashed, some forward and some back, drowning one another.
Still the cannon balls continued regularly to whistle and flop onto the
ice and into the water and oftenest of all among the crowd that covered
the dam, the pond, and the bank.
hand, lay Prince Andrew Bolkónski bleeding profusely and unconsciously
uttering a gentle, piteous, and childlike moan.
Toward evening he ceased moaning and became quite still. He did not know
alive and suffering from a burning, lacerating pain in his head.
He listened and heard the sound of approaching horses, and voices
sky with clouds that had risen and were floating still higher, and
between them gleamed blue infinity. He did not turn his head and did not
see those who, judging by the sound of hoofs and voices, had ridden up
and stopped near him.
firing at the Augesd Dam and was looking at the killed and wounded left
who, with his face buried in the ground and a blackened nape, lay on his
“Have some brought from the reserve,” said Napoleon, and having gone
Prince Andrew understood that this was said of him and that it was
did they not interest him, but he took no notice of them and at once
and he saw above him the remote, lofty, and everlasting sky. He knew it
between himself and that lofty infinite sky with the clouds flying over
it. At that moment it meant nothing to him who might be standing over
him, or what was said of him; he was only glad that people were standing
near him and only wished that they would help him and bring him back to
understand it so differently. He collected all his strength, to stir and
utter a sound. He feebly moved his leg and uttered a weak, sickly groan
“Ah! He is alive,” said Napoleon. “Lift this young man up and
hand, rode up smiling to the Emperor to congratulate him on the victory.
being moved, and the probing of his wound at the dressing station.
wounded and captured Russian officers he was carried to the hospital.
During this transfer he felt a little stronger and was able to look
about him and even speak.
“All the same! They say this one is the commander of all the Emperor
Alexander’s Guards,” said the first one, indicating a Russian
“You are the commander of the Emperor Alexander’s regiment of Horse
“I commanded a squadron,” replied Repnín.
“The praise of a great commander is a soldier’s highest reward,”
and, addressing him, again used the epithet “young man” that was
“Well, and you, young man,” said he. “How do you feel, mon
hero himself with his paltry vanity and joy in victory appear,
compared to the lofty, equitable, and kindly sky which he had seen and
Everything seemed so futile and insignificant in comparison with the
stern and solemn train of thought that weakness from loss of blood,
suffering, and the nearness of death aroused in him. Looking into
greatness, the unimportance of life which no one could understand, and
alive could understand or explain.
The Emperor without waiting for an answer turned away and said to one of
the officers as he went: “Have these gentlemen attended to and taken
Prince Repnín!” and he spurred his horse and galloped away.
His face shone with self-satisfaction and pleasure.
The soldiers who had carried Prince Andrew had noticed and taken the
Prince Andrew did not see how and by whom it was replaced, but the
sister had hung round his neck with such emotion and reverence, “it
would be good if everything were as clear and simple as it seems to
and what to expect after it beyond the grave! How happy and calm I
understand, and the greatness of something incomprehensible but
his feverishness increased and he grew delirious. Visions of his father,
wife, sister, and future son, and the tenderness he had felt the night
before the battle, the figure of the insignificant little Napoleon, and
The quiet home life and peaceful happiness of Bald Hills presented
shortsighted delight at the misery of others, and doubts and torments
had followed, and only the heavens promised peace. Toward morning
all these dreams melted and merged into the chaos and darkness of
unconciousness and oblivion which in the opinion of Napoleon’s doctor,
“He is a nervous, bilious subject,” said Larrey, “and will not
was going home to Vorónezh and Rostóv persuaded him to travel with him
as far as Moscow and to stay with him there. Meeting a comrade at
bottles of wine with him and, despite the jolting ruts across the
at the bottom of the sleigh beside Rostóv, who grew more and more
shops, bakers’ signboards, street lamps, and sleighs!” thought
Rostóv, when their leave permits had been passed at the town gate and
has his stand, and there’s Zakhár himself and still the same horse!
Denísov raised his head, coughed, and made no answer.
“Yes, sir, and there’s a light in your father’s study.”
all. At last the sleigh bore to the right, drew up at an entrance, and
broken off, the porch, and the post by the side of the pavement. He
sprang out before the sleigh stopped, and ran into the hall. The house
stood cold and silent, as if quite regardless of who had come to it.
he thought, stopping for a moment with a sinking heart, and then
immediately starting to run along the hall and up the warped steps of
the familiar staircase. The well-known old door handle, which always
as ever. A solitary tallow candle burned in the anteroom.
door and his expression of sleepy indifference suddenly changed to one
young master. “Can it be? My treasure!” and Prokófy, trembling with
announce him, but, changing his mind, came back and stooped to kiss the
forestall him, threw off his fur coat and ran on tiptoe through the
tables and the same chandelier with a cover over it; but someone had
already seen the young master, and, before he had reached the drawing
room, something flew out from a side door like a tornado and began
hugging and kissing him. Another and yet another creature of the same
kind sprang from a second door and a third; more hugging, more kissing,
more outcries, and tears of joy. He could not distinguish which was
Papa, which Natásha, and which Pétya. Everyone shouted, talked, and
changed!... Where are the candles?... Tea!...”
“Dearest... and me!”
Sónya, Natásha, Pétya, Anna Mikháylovna, Véra, and the old count
were all hugging him, and the serfs, men and maids, flocked into the
room, exclaiming and oh-ing and ah-ing.
Natásha, after she had pulled him down toward her and covered his face
with kisses, holding him tight by the skirt of his coat, sprang away and
pranced up and down in one place like a goat and shrieked piercingly.
All around were loving eyes glistening with tears of joy, and all around
Sónya too, all rosy red, clung to his arm and, radiant with bliss,
longed. Sónya now was sixteen and she was very pretty, especially at
her eyes off him, and smiling and holding her breath. He gave her a
grateful look, but was still expectant and looking for someone. The old
he had left. All the others let him go, and he ran to her. When they
who had come into the room unnoticed by anyone, stood there and wiped
“You are most welcome! I know, I know,” said the count, kissing and
springing to him, putting her arms round him, and kissing him. This
and, taking Natásha’s hand, kissed it.
Denísov was shown to the room prepared for him, and the Rostóvs all
The old countess, not letting go of his hand and kissing it every
eyes off him. His brother and sisters struggled for the places nearest
to him and disputed with one another who should bring him his tea,
handkerchief, and pipe.
insufficient, and he kept expecting something more, more and yet more.
satchels, sabretaches, open portmanteaus, and dirty boots. Two freshly
were bringing in jugs and basins, hot water for shaving, and their
well-brushed clothes. There was a masculine odor and a smell of tobacco.
A rustle of starched petticoats and the whispering and laughter of
crack and there was a glimpse of something blue, of ribbons, black hair,
and merry faces. It was Natásha, Sónya, and Pétya, who had come to
Meanwhile, Pétya, having found and seized the sabers in the outer room,
with the delight boys feel at the sight of a military elder brother, and
and went out. Natásha had put on one spurred boot and was just getting
her foot into the other. Sónya, when he came in, was twirling round and
was about to expand her dresses into a balloon and sit down. They were
dressed alike, in new pale-blue frocks, and were both fresh, rosy, and
one another time to ask questions and give replies concerning a thousand
they were saying was amusing, but because she felt happy and was unable
soul and his face.
She pulled up her muslin sleeve and showed him a red scar on her long,
fire and pressed it there!”
to be his old schoolroom, and looking into Natásha’s wildly bright
eyes, Rostóv re-entered that world of home and childhood which had no
and the burning of an arm with a ruler as a proof of love did not seem
to him senseless, he understood and was not surprised at it.
“Well, and is that all?” he asked.
for life, but I don’t understand that, I forget quickly.”
“Well, she loves me and you like that.”
free.’ Isn’t that lovely and noble! Yes, very noble? Isn’t it?”
asked Natásha, so seriously and excitedly that it was evident that what
“No, no!” cried Natásha, “she and I have already talked it over.
her because you must, and that wouldn’t do at all.”
that for an instant). Why should he not love her now, and even marry
and interests before him! “Yes, they have taken a wise decision,” he
“Well, and are you still true to Borís?” he continued.
about him or anyone else, and I don’t want anything of the kind.”
“Now?” repeated Natásha, and a happy smile lit up her face. “Have
understand. That’s what I’m up to.”
together, and made some steps on the very tips of her toes.
“See, I’m standing! See!” she said, but could not maintain herself
Rostóv laughed so loud and merrily that Denísov, in his bedroom, felt
envious and Natásha could not help joining in.
“Oh, well then, good-by: go and dress. Is he very terrible,
And Natásha rose and went out of the room on tiptoe, like a ballet
be done; he felt that everybody, including his mother and sisters, was
looking inquiringly at him and watching to see how he would behave
with her. He kissed her hand and addressed her not as thou but as
you—Sónya. But their eyes met and said thou, and exchanged tender
Natásha’s intermediacy, to remind him of his promise, and then
freedom and told her that one way or another he would never cease to
silent, “that Sónya and Nicholas now say you to one another and meet
only Sónya, Nicholas, and Natásha, but even the old countess,
pomaded hair, perfumed, and in a new uniform, looking just as smart as
he made himself when going into battle, and he was more amiable to the
ladies and gentlemen than Rostóv had ever expected to see him.
by his home circle as the best of sons, a hero, and their darling
Nikólenka; by his relations as a charming, attractive, and polite young
man; by his acquaintances as a handsome lieutenant of hussars, a good
dancer, and one of the best matches in the city.
that year, as all his estates had been remortgaged, and so Nicholas,
latest cut, such as no one else yet had in Moscow, and boots of the
latest fashion, with extremely pointed toes and small silver spurs,
at home again. He felt that he had grown up and matured very much. His
Now he was a lieutenant of hussars, in a jacket laced with silver, and
action, and in the company of well-known, elderly, and respected racing
Kámenski, visited the English Club, and was on intimate terms with a
he did not see him and had no opportunity of seeing him, he often spoke
about him and about his love for him, letting it be understood that he
had not told all and that there was something in his feelings for the
Emperor not everyone could understand, and with his whole soul he shared
very pretty and sweet, and evidently deeply in love with him, but he was
time for that sort of thing and a young man fears to bind himself and
“Ah, there will be, and there are, many more such girls somewhere whom
and into ladies’ society with an affectation of doing so against his
will. The races, the English Club, sprees with Denísov, and visits to
a certain house—that was another matter and quite the thing for a
The count walked up and down the hall in his dressing gown, giving
orders to the club steward and to the famous Feoktíst, the club’s
head cook, about asparagus, fresh cucumbers, strawberries, veal, and
fish for this dinner. The count had been a member and on the committee
so well how to arrange a feast on an open-handed, hospitable scale,
and still fewer men would be so well able and willing to make up out of
The club cook and the steward listened to the count’s orders with
several thousand rubles.
“Well then, mind and have cocks’ comb in the turtle soup, you
who appeared at his call. “Hurry off and tell Maksím, the gardener,
importance, he returned again, called back the cook and the club
steward, and again began giving orders. A light footstep and the
clinking of spurs were heard at the door, and the young count, handsome,
rosy, with a dark little mustache, evidently rested and made sleeker by
And the count turned to the cook, who, with a shrewd and respectful
expression, looked observantly and sympathetically at the father and
dinner, but providing it and serving it all up, that’s not their
“That’s it, that’s it!” exclaimed the count, and gaily seizing
his son by both hands, he cried, “Now I’ve got you, so take the
sleigh and pair at once, and go to Bezúkhov’s, and tell him ‘Count
Ilyá has sent you to ask for strawberries and fresh pineapples.’ We
have to go in and ask the princesses; and from there go on to the
Rasgulyáy—the coachman Ipátka knows—and look up the gypsy
white Cossack coat, and bring him along to me.”
At that moment, with noiseless footsteps and with the businesslike,
dressing gown every day, he invariably became confused and begged her to
eyes. “But I’ll go to Bezúkhov’s myself. Pierre has arrived, and
of his commissions and ordered the small closed carriage for her.
Anna Mikháylovna turned up her eyes, and profound sadness was depicted
as young Bezúkhov! Yes, I pity him from my heart, and shall try to give
“Wh-what is the matter?” asked both the young and old Rostóv.
up, invited him to his house in Petersburg, and now... she has come here
and that daredevil after her!” said Anna Mikháylovna, wishing to show
her sympathy for Pierre, but by involuntary intonations and a half smile
Next day, the third of March, soon after one o’clock, two hundred and
fifty members of the English Club and fifty guests were awaiting the
guest of honor and hero of the Austrian campaign, Prince Bagratión, to
and well informed foregathered when the news began to arrive in
December, nothing was said about the war and the last battle, as
Count Markóv, and Prince Vyázemski—did not show themselves at the
club, but met in private houses in intimate circles, and the
of the war and without leaders. The Moscovites felt that something was
wrong and that to discuss the bad news was difficult, and so it was best
the bigwigs who guided the club’s opinion reappeared, and everybody
began speaking clearly and definitely. Reasons were found for the
incredible, unheard-of, and impossible event of a Russian defeat,
everything became clear, and in all corners of Moscow the same things
defective commissariat, the treachery of the Pole Przebyszéwski and of
the Frenchman Langeron, Kutúzov’s incapacity, and (it was whispered)
the youth and inexperience of the sovereign, who had trusted worthless
and insignificant people. But the army, the Russian army, everyone
declared, was extraordinary and had achieved miracles of valor. The
soldiers, officers, and generals were heroes. But the hero of heroes was
Prince Bagratión, distinguished by his Schön Grabern affair and by
unbroken and had all day beaten back an enemy force twice as numerous
and was a stranger there. In his person, honor was shown to a simple
fighting Russian soldier without connections and intrigues, and to one
expressing disapproval and dislike of Kutúzov.
calling him a court weathercock and an old satyr.
modeling and modeling you must get smeared with clay,” suggesting
consolation for our defeat by the memory of former victories; and the
by highfalutin words, and Germans by logical arguments to show them
soldiers only need to be restrained and held back! On all sides, new and
our officers and men at Austerlitz. One had saved a standard, another
had killed five Frenchmen, a third had loaded five cannon singlehanded.
wounded in the right hand, taken his sword in the left, and gone
forward. Of Bolkónski, nothing was said, and only those who knew him
The members and guests of the club wandered hither and thither, sat,
stood, met, and separated, some in uniform and some in evening dress,
and a few here and there with powdered hair and in Russian kaftáns.
Powdered footmen, in livery with buckled shoes and smart stockings,
men with broad, self-confident faces, fat fingers, and resolute gestures
and voices. This class of guests and members sat in certain habitual
places and met in certain habitual groups. A minority of those present
Rostóv, and Dólokhov—who was now again an officer in the Semënov
respect and honor you, but all the same remember that the future belongs
wife’s command had let his hair grow and abandoned his spectacles,
went about the rooms fashionably dressed but looking sad and dull. Here,
his wealth, and being in the habit of lording it over these people, he
and connections he belonged to the groups of old and honored guests, and
Count Rostopchín, Valúev, and Narýshkin. Rostopchín was describing
how the Russians had been overwhelmed by flying Austrians and had had to
the nonsense talked by the Austrian generals. Shinshín, standing close
feel that in that place and on that day, it was improper to speak so of
Count Ilyá Rostóv, hurried and preoccupied, went about in his soft
boots between the dining and drawing rooms, hastily greeting the
important and unimportant, all of whom he knew, as if they were all
young son, resting on him and winking joyfully at him. Young Rostóv
made and highly valued. The old count came up to them and pressed
Dólokhov’s hand.
“Please come and visit us... you know my brave boy... been together
stir, and a footman who had run in announced, with a frightened face:
Bells rang, the stewards rushed forward, and—like rye shaken together
came together and crowded in the large drawing room by the door of the
of Austerlitz, but wore a tight new uniform with Russian and foreign
Orders, and the Star of St. George on his left breast. Evidently just
before coming to the dinner he had had his hair and whiskers trimmed,
festive in his air, which, in conjunction with his firm and virile
features, gave him a rather comical expression. Bekleshëv and Theodore
wishing to avail himself of their courtesy, and this caused some delay
and awkwardly over the parquet floor of the reception room, not knowing
what to do with his hands; he was more accustomed to walk over a plowed
Schön Grabern—and he would have found that easier. The committeemen
met him at the first door and, expressing their delight at seeing such a
for his reply, surrounded him, and led him to the drawing room. It was
members and guests jostling one another and trying to get a good look
animal. Count Ilyá Rostóv, laughing and repeating the words, “Make
energetically than anyone, led the guests into the drawing room, and
way through the crowd, went out of the drawing room and reappeared a
composed and printed in the hero’s honor. Bagratión, on seeing the
demanded that he should submit. Feeling himself in their power, he
resolutely took the salver with both hands and looked sternly and
held it till evening and have gone in to dinner with it) and drew his
“Well, I will read them, then!” Bagratión seemed to say, and,
fixing his weary eyes on the paper, began to read them with a fixed and
serious expression. But the author himself took the verses and began
reading them aloud. Bagratión bowed his head and listened:
   Bring glory then to Alexander’s reign
that dinner was ready! The door opened, and from the dining room came
and Count Rostóv, glancing angrily at the author who went on reading
was more important than verses, and Bagratión, again preceding all the
two Alexanders—Bekleshëv and Narýshkin—which was a significant
seats in the dining room, according to their rank and importance: the
deepest where the land lies lowest.
who recognized him and said a few words to him, disjointed and awkward,
as were all the words he spoke that day, and Count Ilyá looked joyfully
and proudly around while Bagratión spoke to his son.
Nicholas Rostóv, with Denísov and his new acquaintance, Dólokhov, sat
sat facing Bagratión and, as the very personification of Moscow
His efforts had not been in vain. The dinner, both the Lenten and the
footmen, and awaited each expected dish with some anxiety. Everything
began popping corks and filling the champagne glasses. After the fish,
begin,” he whispered, and taking up his glass, he rose. All were
“To the health of our Sovereign, the Emperor!” he cried, and at the
same moment his kindly eyes grew moist with tears of joy and enthusiasm.
The band immediately struck up “Conquest’s joyful thunder
waken...” All rose and cried “Hurrah!” Bagratión also rose and
health of our Sovereign, the Emperor!” he roared, “Hurrah!” and
his example, and the loud shouting continued for a long time. When the
voices subsided, the footmen cleared away the broken glass and everybody
sat down again, smiling at the noise they had made and exchanging
his plate, and proposed a toast, “To the health of the hero of our
last campaign, Prince Peter Ivánovich Bagratión!” and again his blue
but instead of the band a choir began singing a cantata composed by Paul
As soon as the singing was over, another and another toast was proposed
and Count Ilyá Rostóv became more and more moved, more glass was
smashed, and the shouting grew louder. They drank to Bekleshëv,
to all the club members and to all the club guests, and finally to
toast, the count took out his handkerchief and, covering his face, wept
Pierre sat opposite Dólokhov and Nicholas Rostóv. As usual, he ate and
drank much, and eagerly. But those who knew him intimately noticed that
dinner and looked about, blinking and scowling, or, with fixed eyes and
nose. His face was depressed and gloomy. He seemed to see and hear
nothing of what was going on around him and to be absorbed by some
depressing and unsolved problem.
his wife, and by an anonymous letter he had received that morning, which
disbelieved both the princess’ hints and the letter, but he feared
he chanced to meet Dólokhov’s handsome insolent eyes, Pierre felt
something terrible and monstrous rising in his soul and turned quickly
away. Involuntarily recalling his wife’s past and her relations with
former position after the campaign, had returned to Petersburg and come
companion, Dólokhov had come straight to his house, and Pierre had put
him up and lent him money. Pierre recalled how Hélène had smilingly
expressed disapproval of Dólokhov’s living at their house, and how
cynically Dólokhov had praised his wife’s beauty to him and from that
“Yes, he is very handsome,” thought Pierre, “and I know him. It
would be particularly pleasant to him to dishonor my name and ridicule
and helped him. I know and understand what a spice that would add to the
but I do not believe it. I have no right to, and can’t, believe it.”
of cruelty, as when tying the policeman to the bear and dropping them
seem to him that everyone is afraid of him, and that must please him.
He must think that I, too, am afraid of him—and in fact I am afraid of
him,” he thought, and again he felt something terrible and monstrous
rising in his soul. Dólokhov, Denísov, and Rostóv were now sitting
opposite Pierre and seemed very gay. Rostóv was talking merrily to his
two friends, one of whom was a dashing hussar and the other a notorious
duelist and rake, and every now and then he glanced ironically at
Pierre, whose preoccupied, absent-minded, and massive figure was a very
husband of a beauty, and in a word—an old woman; and secondly because
Pierre in his preoccupation and absent-mindedness had not recognized
Rostóv and had not responded to his greeting. When the Emperor’s
Pierre sighed, rose submissively, emptied his glass, and, waiting till
“One should make up to the husbands of pretty women,” said Denísov.
about him. He reddened and turned away.
“Well, now to the health of handsome women!” said Dólokhov, and
“Here’s to the health of lovely women, Peterkin—and their
across, snatched it from his hand and began reading it. Pierre looked
at Dólokhov and his eyes dropped, the something terrible and monstrous
that had tormented him all dinnertime rose and took possession of him.
Hearing that cry and seeing to whom it was addressed, Nesvítski and the
Dólokhov looked at Pierre with clear, mirthful, cruel eyes, and that
“You...! you... scoundrel! I challenge you!” he ejaculated, and,
At the very instant he did this and uttered those words, Pierre felt
the whole day was finally and indubitably answered in the affirmative.
He hated her and was forever sundered from her. Despite Denísov’s
Dólokhov’s second, and after dinner he discussed the arrangements for
Rostóv with Dólokhov and Denísov stayed on at the club till late,
listening to the gypsies and other singers.
words. If you are going to fight a duel, and you make a will and write
affectionate letters to your parents, and if you think you may be
killed, you are a fool and are lost for certain. But go with the firm
intention of killing your man as quickly and surely as possible, and
fear’s all gone, and your only thought is not to let him get away!’
Next day, at eight in the morning, Pierre and Nesvítski drove to the
Sokólniki forest and found Dólokhov, Denísov, and Rostóv already
had no connection with the matter in hand. His haggard face was yellow.
He had evidently not slept that night. He looked about distractedly and
night he had not the slightest doubt, and the guiltlessness of
particularly calm and absent-minded way, which inspired the respect of
and the pistols loaded, Nesvítski went up to Pierre.
“and should not justify your confidence and the honor you have done
“Then allow me to express your regrets, and I am sure your opponent
the affair, and like everyone in similar cases, did not yet believe that
and where to shoot,” he said with an unnaturally gentle smile.
He took the pistol in his hand and began asking about the working of the
trigger, as he had not before held a pistol in his hand—a fact that he
his side had been attempting a reconciliation), and he also went up to
the deep wet snow between the place where they had been standing and
Nesvítski’s and Dólokhov’s sabers, which were stuck into the
ground ten paces apart to mark the barrier. It was thawing and misty; at
been ready, but they still delayed and all were silent.
Denísov first went to the barrier and announced: “As the
pistols, and at the word thwee begin to advance.
“O-ne! T-wo! Thwee!” he shouted angrily and stepped aside.
The combatants advanced along the trodden tracks, nearer and nearer to
“So I can fire when I like!” said Pierre, and at the word
“three,” he went quickly forward, missing the trodden path and
stepping into the deep snow. He held the pistol in his right hand at
hand he held carefully back, because he wished to support his right
hand with it and knew he must not do so. Having advanced six paces and
then quickly glanced at Dólokhov and, bending his finger as he had been
at the sound and then, smiling at his own sensations, stood still. The
only heard Dólokhov’s hurried steps, and his figure came in view
through the smoke. He was pressing one hand to his left side, while
toward him and said something.
saber, he sank on the snow beside it. His left hand was bloody; he wiped
it on his coat and supported himself with it. His frowning face was
pallid and quivered.
Pierre, hardly restraining his sobs, began running toward Dólokhov and
“To your barrier!” and Pierre, grasping what was meant, stopped by
drew in his legs and sat up, seeking a firm center of gravity. He sucked
and swallowed the cold snow, his lips quivered but his eyes, still
smiling, glittered with effort and exasperation as he mustered his
remaining strength. He raised his pistol and aimed.
Pierre, with a gentle smile of pity and remorse, his arms and legs
Dólokhov and looked sorrowfully at him. Denísov, Rostóv, and
and Dólokhov’s angry cry.
“Missed!” shouted Dólokhov, and he lay helplessly, face downwards
Pierre clutched his temples, and turning round went into the forest,
trampling through the deep snow, and muttering incoherent words:
Nesvítski stopped him and took him home.
Rostóv and Denísov drove away with the wounded Dólokhov.
The latter lay silent in the sleigh with closed eyes and did not answer
suddenly came to and, lifting his head with an effort, took Rostóv, who
was sitting beside him, by the hand. Rostóv was struck by the
totally altered and unexpectedly rapturous and tender expression on
“My mother! My mother, my angel, my adored angel mother,” and
Dólokhov pressed Rostóv’s hand and burst into tears.
He implored Rostóv to go on and prepare her.
Rostóv went on ahead to do what was asked, and to his great surprise
with an old mother and a hunchback sister, and was the most affectionate
of sons and brothers.
Pierre had of late rarely seen his wife alone. Both in Petersburg and in
He lay down on the sofa meaning to fall asleep and forget all that
thoughts, and memories suddenly arose within him that he could not fall
asleep, nor even remain in one place, but had to jump up and pace the
their marriage, with bare shoulders and a languid, passionate look on
her face, and then immediately he saw beside her Dólokhov’s handsome,
insolent, hard, and mocking face as he had seen it at the banquet, and
then that same face pale, quivering, and suffering, as it had been when
he reeled and sank on the snow.
loving her; in deceiving yourself and her.” And he vividly recalled
He remembered his honeymoon and blushed at the recollection.
Particularly vivid, humiliating, and shameful was the recollection of
study a little before noon in his silk dressing gown and found his head
steward there, who, bowing respectfully, looked into his face and at
his dressing gown and smiled slightly, as if expressing respectful
understanding of his employer’s happiness.
and social tact,” thought he; “been proud of my house, in which she
received all Petersburg, proud of her unapproachability and beauty. So
this is what I was proud of! I then thought that I did not understand
I was to blame for not understanding her, for not understanding that
constant composure and complacency and lack of all interests or desires,
and the whole secret lies in the terrible truth that she is a depraved
“Anatole used to come to borrow money from her and used to kiss her
kissed. Her father in jest tried to rouse her jealousy, and she replied
she felt any symptoms of pregnancy. She laughed contemptuously and said
she was not a fool to want to have children, and that she was not going
Then he recalled the coarseness and bluntness of her thoughts and the
young and old men and women Pierre could not understand why he did not
And now there’s Dólokhov sitting in the snow with a forced smile and
which was a lie, and worse than a lie? I am guilty and must endure...
nonsense,” he thought. “The slur on my name and honor—that’s all
“Louis XVI was executed because they said he was dishonorable and a
criminal,” came into Pierre’s head, “and from their point of
view they were right, as were those too who canonized him and died a
a despot. Who is right and who is wrong? No one! But if you are
most strongly expressed his insincere love for her, and he felt the
blood rush to his heart and had again to get up and move about and break
and tear whatever came to his hand. “Why did I tell her that ‘Je
faire dans cette galère?” * occurred to him, and he began to laugh at
In the night he called his valet and told him to pack up to go to
resolved to go away next day and leave a letter informing her of his
was lying asleep on the ottoman with an open book in his hand.
He woke up and looked round for a while with a startled expression,
herself in a white satin dressing gown embroidered with silver and with
a coronet) entered the room, calm and majestic, except that there was
She knew of the duel and had come to speak about it. She waited till the
valet had set down the coffee things and left the room. Pierre looked
at her timidly over his spectacles, and like a hare surrounded by hounds
who lays back her ears and continues to crouch motionless before her
and impossible, he again glanced timidly at her. She did not sit down
Pierre turned over heavily on the ottoman and opened his mouth, but
word, “and you believed it! Well, what have you proved? What does this
all Moscow, that everyone will say that you, drunk and not knowing what
Hélène raised her voice and became more and more excited, “A man
“Hm... Hm...!” growled Pierre, frowning without looking at her, and
his company? If you were cleverer and more agreeable, I should prefer
“Why shouldn’t I speak? I can speak as I like, and I tell you
plainly that there are not many wives with husbands such as you who
expression she did not understand, and lay down again. He was suffering
physically at that moment, there was a weight on his chest and he could
Pierre leaped up from the sofa and rushed staggering toward her.
“I’ll kill you!” he shouted, and seizing the marble top of a table
brandishing the slab.
Hélène’s face became terrible, she shrieked and sprang aside. His
father’s nature showed itself in Pierre. He felt the fascination and
delight of frenzy. He flung down the slab, broke it, and swooping
down on her with outstretched hands shouted, “Get out!” in such a
in Great Russia, which formed the larger part of his property, and left
Two months had elapsed since the news of the battle of Austerlitz and
the loss of Prince Andrew had reached Bald Hills, and in spite of the
letters sent through the embassy and all the searches made, his body had
place and that he might now be lying, recovering or dying, alone among
strangers and unable to send news of himself. The gazettes from which
very briefly and vaguely, that after brilliant engagements the Russians
had had to retreat and had made their withdrawal in perfect order. The
“Your son,” wrote Kutúzov, “fell before my eyes, a standard in
his hand and at the head of a regiment—he fell as a hero, worthy of
his father and his fatherland. To the great regret of myself and of the
myself and you with the hope that your son is alive, for otherwise
was silent with his steward, the gardener, and the architect, and though
lathe and, as usual, did not look round at her.
impetus, and Princess Mary long remembered the dying creak of that
She approached him, saw his face, and something gave way within her. Her
crushed, but angry and working unnaturally, she saw that hanging over
her and about to crush her was some terrible misfortune, the worst
in life, one she had not yet experienced, irreparable and
an indescribable charm of sorrow and self-forgetfulness that her father
Kutúzov writes...” and he screamed as piercingly as if he wished to
hearing these words her face changed and something brightened in her
joys and sorrows of this world—overflowed the great grief within her.
She forgot all fear of her father, went up to him, took his hand, and
go and tell Lise.”
The princess sank helplessly into an armchair beside her father and
leave of her and of Lise, his look tender yet proud. She saw him tender
and amused as he was when he put on the little icon. “Did he believe?
of eternal peace and blessedness?” she thought.
“Go! Go! Killed in battle, where the best of Russian men and
Russia’s glory were led to destruction. Go, Princess Mary. Go and tell
working and looked up with that curious expression of inner, happy calm
joyful and mysterious taking place within her.
“Mary,” she said, moving away from the embroidery frame and lying
back, “give me your hand.” She took her sister-in-law’s hand and
Her eyes were smiling expectantly, her downy lip rose and remained
Princess Mary knelt down before her and hid her face in the folds of her
bright and happy eyes at her sister-in-law.
prepare her sister-in-law, and every time began to cry. Unobservant as
understand, agitated her. She said nothing but looked about uneasily as
always afraid, came into her room with a peculiarly restless and malign
expression and went out again without saying a word. She looked at
and suddenly began to cry.
“No, you know it’s too soon for news. But my father is anxious and I
She had determined not to tell her and persuaded her father to hide the
within a few days. Princess Mary and the old prince each bore and hid
he made up his mind that Prince Andrew had been killed, and though he
memory, and he told everybody that his son had been killed. He tried not
less, ate less, slept less, and became weaker every day. Princess Mary
hoped. She prayed for her brother as living and was always awaiting news
of the nineteenth March, and her downy little lip rose from old habit,
but as sorrow was manifest in every smile, the sound of every word, and
Courage, my angel.” She kissed Lise and was about to leave the room.
“Oh, no, no!” And besides the pallor and the physical suffering
a suffering child and to wring her little hands even with some
white hands with an air of calm importance.
princess. (In accordance with Lise’s and Prince Andrew’s wishes they
had sent in good time to Moscow for a doctor and were expecting him at
their faces was a quiet and solemn look.
house, now and then opening her door when someone passed and watching
and out of the bedroom glanced at the princess and turned away. She did
not venture to ask any questions, and shut the door again, now sitting
the icon stand. To her surprise and distress she found that her prayers
did not calm her excitement. Suddenly her door opened softly and her old
“I’ve come to sit with you a bit, Másha,” said the nurse, “and
here I’ve brought the prince’s wedding candles to light before his
The nurse lit the gilt candles before the icons and sat down by the door
with her knitting. Princess Mary took a book and began reading. Only
princess anxious and inquiring, the nurse encouraging. Everyone in the
ordinary staid and respectful good manners habitual in the prince’s
household, a common anxiety, a softening of the heart, and a
consciousness that something great and mysterious was being accomplished
hall all sat waiting, silently and alert. In the outlying serfs’
quarters torches and candles were burning and no one slept. The old
prince, stepping on his heels, paced up and down his study and sent
prince told me to ask,’ and come and tell me her answer.”
Tíkhon went and told the prince.
“Very good!” said the prince closing the door behind him, and
After a while he re-entered it as if to snuff the candles, and, seeing
face, shook his head, and going up to him silently kissed him on the
shoulder and left the room without snuffing the candles or saying why he
Evening passed, night came, and the feeling of suspense and softening of
sway and scatters its last snows and storms with desperate fury. A relay
Moscow who was expected every moment, and men on horseback with lanterns
hollows and snow-covered pools of water.
kerchief, and the loose skin that hung under her chin.
Nurse Sávishna, knitting in hand, was telling in low tones, scarcely
hearing or understanding her own words, what she had told hundreds of
returned), and, forcing open a loosely closed latch, set the damask
curtain flapping and blew out the candle with its chill, snowy draft.
knitting, went to the window and leaning out tried to catch the open
casement. The cold wind flapped the ends of her kerchief and her loose
said, holding the casement and not closing it. “With lanterns. Most
“Oh, my God! thank God!” said Princess Mary. “I must go and meet
Princess Mary threw a shawl over her head and ran to meet the newcomer.
with lanterns, standing at the entrance. She went out on the stairs. On
a banister post stood a tallow candle which guttered in the draft. On
the landing below, Philip, the footman, stood looking scared and holding
another candle. Still lower, beyond the turn of the staircase, one
could hear the footstep of someone in thick felt boots, and a voice that
Then the voice said something more, Demyán replied, and the steps in
would be too extraordinary,” and at the very moment she thought this,
the face and figure of Prince Andrew, in a fur cloak the deep collar of
which covered with snow, appeared on the landing where the footman
stood with the candle. Yes, it was he, pale, thin, with a changed and
stairs and embraced his sister.
“You did not get my letter?” he asked, and not waiting for a
station), and again embraced his sister.
cloak and felt boots, he went to the little princess’ apartment.
head (the pains had just left her). Strands of her black hair lay round
her inflamed and perspiring cheeks, her charming rosy mouth with its
downy lip was open and she was smiling joyfully. Prince Andrew entered
and paused facing her at the foot of the sofa on which she was lying.
Her glittering eyes, filled with childlike fear and excitement, rested
on him without changing their expression. “I love you all and have
seemed to say. She saw her husband, but did not realize the significance
of his appearance before her now. Prince Andrew went round the sofa and
She looked at him inquiringly and with childlike reproach.
“I expected help from you and I get none, none from you either!”
her sufferings or with their relief. The pangs began again and Mary
The doctor entered. Prince Andrew went out and, meeting Princess Mary,
off at every moment. They waited and listened.
Prince Andrew went again to his wife and sat waiting in the room next
to hers. A woman came from the bedroom with a frightened face and became
confused when she saw Prince Andrew. He covered his face with his hands
and remained so for some minutes. Piteous, helpless, animal moans came
through the door. Prince Andrew got up, went to the door, and tried to
He began pacing the room. The screaming ceased, and a few more seconds
the door; the scream ceased and he heard the wail of an infant.
choked him, and leaning his elbows on the window sill he began to cry,
tucked up, without a coat, pale and with a trembling jaw, came out
bewildered look and passed by without a word. A woman rushed out and
her in five minutes before and, despite the fixed eyes and the pallor of
“I love you all, and have done no harm to anyone; and what have you
In a corner of the room something red and tiny gave a grunt and squealed
in Mary Bogdánovna’s trembling white hands.
room. The old man already knew everything. He was standing close to
the door and as soon as it opened his rough old arms closed like a vise
round his son’s neck, and without a word he began to sob like a child.
Three days later the little princess was buried, and Prince Andrew went
“Ah, what have you done to me?” it still seemed to say, and Prince
Andrew felt that something gave way in his soul and that he was guilty
old man too came up and kissed the waxen little hands that lay quietly
crossed one on the other on her breast, and to him, too, her face seemed
to say: “Ah, what have you done to me, and why?” And at the sight
Another five days passed, and then the young Prince Nicholas Andréevich
the priest with a goose feather anointed the boy’s little red and
wrinkled soles and palms.
His grandfather, who was his godfather, trembling and afraid of dropping
him, carried the infant round the battered tin font and handed him over
faint with fear lest the baby should be drowned in the font, and awaited
the nurse brought it to him and nodded approval when she told him that
the efforts of the old count, and instead of being degraded to the ranks
recovered, and Rostóv became very friendly with him during his
passionately and tenderly, and old Mary Ivánovna, who had grown fond of
“Yes, Count,” she would say, “he is too noble and pure-souled for
and even now never says a word against him. Those pranks in Petersburg
I think there were not many such gallant sons of the fatherland out
honor? Knowing him to be an only son, to challenge him and shoot so
owed him money! What baseness! What meanness! I know you understand
people do understand him. He is such a lofty, heavenly soul!”
I love so that I would give my life for them, and the others I’d
and two or three friends—you among them—and as for the rest I only
that divine purity and devotion I look for in women. If I found such a
one I’d give my life for her! But those!...” and he made a gesture
regenerate, purify, and elevate me. But you don’t understand it.”
“Oh, yes, I quite understand,” answered Rostóv, who was under his
Denísov also came back and stayed with them. The first half of the
happiest, merriest times for him and the whole family. Nicholas brought
many young men to his parents’ house. Véra was a handsome girl
flower; Natásha, half grown up and half child, was now childishly
atmosphere characteristic of homes where there are very young and very
happiness), feeling the eager bustle around him, and hearing the fitful
bursts of song and music and the inconsequent but friendly prattle of
young girls ready for anything and full of hope—experienced the same
readiness to fall in love and an expectation of happiness.
man, and that in the duel with Bezúkhov, Pierre was right and Dólokhov
wrong, and further that he was disagreeable and unnatural.
“There’s nothing for me to understand,” she cried out with
resolute self-will, “he is wicked and heartless. There now, I like
your Denísov though he is a rake and all that, still I like him; so
you see I do understand. I don’t know how to put it... with this one
everything is calculated, and I don’t like that. But Denísov...”
even Denísov was nothing compared to Dólokhov—“you must understand
for the society of ladies, began to come often to the house, and the
have dared to say so, knew it and blushed scarlet every time Dólokhov
which they were present, and went to Iogel’s balls for young people
and looked at her in such a way that not only could she not bear his
glances without coloring, but even the old countess and Natásha blushed
“They’re always in love with someone,” he thought of Sónya and
Natásha. But he was not as much at ease with Sónya and Dólokhov as
before and was less frequently at home.
given to raise recruits, ten men in every thousand for the regular army,
and besides this, nine men in every thousand for the militia. Everywhere
Bonaparte was anathematized and in Moscow nothing but the coming war
remaining in Moscow, and only awaited the termination of Denísov’s
from home, at dinners, parties, and balls.
rarely done of late. It was a grand farewell dinner, as he and Denísov
were present, including Dólokhov and Denísov.
Never had love been so much in the air, and never had the amorous
this holiday time. “Seize the moments of happiness, love and be loved!
visiting all the places he meant to go to and where he had been invited,
returned home just before dinner. As soon as he entered he noticed and
felt the tension of the amorous air in the house, and also noticed a
and the old countess were especially disturbed, and to a lesser degree
Sónya and Dólokhov before dinner, and with the kindly sensitiveness
natural to him was very gentle and wary with them both at dinner. On
“He asked you, and Vasíli Dmítrich * is also going.”
“Where would I not go at the countess’ command!” said Denísov,
“Perhaps,” coldly and angrily replied Dólokhov, glancing at Sónya,
and, scowling, he gave Nicholas just such a look as he had given Pierre
“There is something up,” thought Nicholas, and he was further
after dinner. He called Natásha and asked her what was the matter.
seemed to give way within him at this news. Dólokhov was a suitable and
the point of view of the old countess and of society it was out of the
and accept the offer,” but before he had time to say it Natásha began
“Much as Mamma pressed her, she refused, and I know she won’t change
And Natásha kissed her brother and ran away.
A minute later Sónya came in with a frightened, guilty, and scared
look. Nicholas went up to her and kissed her hand. This was the first
time since his return that they had talked alone and about their love.
“Sophie,” he began, timidly at first and then more and more
boldly, “if you wish to refuse one who is not only a brilliant and
love you, and I think I love you more than anyone else....”
“No, but I have been in love a thousand times and shall fall in
confidence, and love as I have for you. Then I am young. Mamma does
“Don’t say that to me! I want nothing. I love you as a brother and
always shall, and I want nothing more.”
And Nicholas again kissed her hand.
and so said the youths and maidens themselves as they danced till they
were ready to drop, and so said the grown-up young men and women who
came to these balls with an air of condescension and found them most
pretty young Princesses Gorchakóv met suitors there and were married
and so further increased the fame of these dances. What distinguished
them from others was the absence of host or hostess and the presence of
the good-natured Iogel, flying about like a feather and bowing according
and amuse themselves as girls of thirteen and fourteen do who are
and so sparkling their eyes. Sometimes the best of the pupils, of whom
de châle, but at this last ball only the écossaise, the anglaise, and
taken a ballroom in Bezúkhov’s house, and the ball, as everyone said,
was a great success. There were many pretty girls and the Rostóv girls
were among the prettiest. They were both particularly happy and gay.
That evening, proud of Dólokhov’s proposal, her refusal, and her
so that the maid could hardly get her hair plaited, and she was
Natásha no less proud of her first long dress and of being at a real
Nicholas and Denísov were walking up and down, looking with kindly
The band struck up the newly introduced mazurka. Nicholas could not
refuse Iogel and asked Sónya to dance. Denísov sat down by the old
ladies and, leaning on his saber and beating time with his foot, told
them something funny and kept them amused, while he watched the young
people dancing, Iogel with Natásha, his pride and his best pupil, were
take his eyes off her and beat time with his saber in a way that clearly
indicated that if he was not dancing it was because he would not and not
Knowing that Denísov had a reputation even in Poland for the masterly
“Go and choose Denísov. He is a real dancer, a wonder!” he said.
When it came to Natásha’s turn to choose a partner, she rose and,
looking at her and waiting. Nicholas saw that Denísov was refusing
“Oh, the faiwy! She can do anything with me!” said Denísov, and
partner’s hand firmly, threw back his head, and advanced his foot,
waiting for the beat. Only on horse back and in the mazurka was
Denísov’s short stature not noticeable and he looked the fine fellow
at his partner with a merry and triumphant air, suddenly stamped with
one foot, bounded from the floor like a ball, and flew round the room
the room, and seeming not to notice the chairs was dashing straight at
them, when suddenly, clinking his spurs and spreading out his legs,
clanking his spurs, whirled rapidly round, and, striking his left heel
he meant to do, and abandoning herself to him followed his lead hardly
with his right hand, then falling on one knee he twirled her round him,
and again jumping up, dashed so impetuously forward that it seemed as if
and then he suddenly stopped and performed some new and unexpected
chair, he drew up with a click of his spurs and bowed to her, Natásha
was delighted with Denísov’s skill, he was asked again and again as
a partner, and the old men began smilingly to talk about Poland and the
good old days. Denísov, flushed after the mazurka and mopping himself
with his handkerchief, sat down by Natásha and did not leave her for
of, and am going to rejoin my regiment, I am giving a farewell supper
theater, where he had been with his family and Denísov. He was at once
two candles. On the table was a pile of gold and paper money, and he
was keeping the bank. Rostóv had not seen him since his proposal and
Sónya’s refusal and felt uncomfortable at the thought of how they
I’ll just finish dealing, and then Ilyúshka will come with his
dinner and at other times, when as if tired of everyday life he had felt
a need to escape from it by some strange, and usually cruel, action.
anything, Dólokhov, looking straight in his face, said slowly and
trusts to luck, one should make certain,’ and I want to try.”
“Well, you’d better not play,” Dólokhov added, and springing a
side and at first did not play. Dólokhov kept glancing at him.
card, putting a small stake on it, and beginning to play.
Rostóv staked five rubles on a card and lost, staked again, and again
The game continued; a waiter kept handing round champagne.
All Rostóv’s cards were beaten and he had eight hundred rubles scored
waiter filled his glass he changed his mind and altered it to his usual
Rostóv submitted. He let the eight hundred remain and laid down a seven
handed him, smiled at Dólokhov’s words, and with a sinking heart,
waiting for a seven to turn up, gazed at Dólokhov’s hands which held
two thousand rubles, and though he always disliked speaking of money
till May, and asked him to be more economical this time. Nicholas had
replied that it would be more than enough for him and that he gave his
Dólokhov’s hands and thought, “Now then, make haste and let me have
this card and I’ll take my cap and drive home to supper with Denísov,
Natásha, and Sónya, and will certainly never touch a card again.” At
with Natásha, piquet with his father, and even his comfortable bed
clearness, and charm that it seemed as if it were all a lost and
might deprive him of all this happiness, newly appreciated and newly
illumined, and plunge him into the depths of unknown and undefined
movement of Dólokhov’s hands. Those broad, reddish hands, with hairy
wrists visible from under the shirt cuffs, laid down the pack and took
up a glass and a pipe that were handed him.
“So you are not afraid to play with me?” repeated Dólokhov, and as
chair, and began deliberately with a smile:
“Oh, those Moscow gossips!” said Dólokhov, and he took up the cards
“Aah!” Rostóv almost screamed lifting both hands to his head. The
An hour and a half later most of the players were but little interested
which he had reckoned up to ten thousand, but that now, as he vaguely
supposed, must have risen to fifteen thousand. In reality it already
exceeded twenty thousand rubles. Dólokhov was no longer listening to
hands and occasionally ran his eyes over the score against him. He had
decided to play until that score reached forty-three thousand. He
had fixed on that number because forty-three was the sum of his and
Sónya’s joint ages. Rostóv, leaning his head on both hands, sat at
and littered with cards. One tormenting impression did not leave him:
that those broad-boned reddish hands with hairy wrists visible from
under the shirt sleeves, those hands which he loved and hated, held him
accept it and fixed the stake himself. Nicholas submitted to him, and at
over the Enns, and then guessed that the card that came first to hand
cords on his coat and took a card with that number and tried staking the
players, or peered at the now cold face of Dólokhov and tried to read
casket for Mamma’s name day and then going home. I was so happy, so
that end and when did this new, terrible state of things begin? What
chose and placed cards, and watched those broad-boned agile hands in the
same way. When did it happen and what has happened? I am well and strong
and still the same and in the same place. No, it can’t be! Surely it
He was flushed and bathed in perspiration, though the room was not hot.
His face was terrible and piteous to see, especially from its helpless
The score against him reached the fateful sum of forty-three thousand.
meant to double the three thousand just put down to his score, when
Dólokhov, slamming down the pack of cards, put it aside and began
he marked the figures in his clear, bold hand.
Some swarthy men and women were really entering from the cold outside
and saying something in their gypsy accents. Nicholas understood that it
by which the total exceeded the round sum of forty-three thousand; and
corner of his card and, instead of the six thousand he had intended,
moment those hands with their short reddish fingers and hairy wrists,
“You owe forty-three thousand, Count,” said Dólokhov, and
“I say, Rostóv,” said Dólokhov clearly, smiling and looking
thought Rostóv. He knew what a shock he would inflict on his father and
escape it all, and felt that Dólokhov knew that he could save him from
all this shame and sorrow, but wanted now to play with him as a cat does
“My cousin has nothing to do with this and it’s not necessary to
“Tomorrow,” replied Rostóv and left the room.
To say “tomorrow” and keep up a dignified tone was not difficult,
but to go home alone, see his sisters, brother, mother, and father,
confess and ask for money he had no right to after giving his word of
from the theater, had had supper and were grouped round the clavichord.
of love which pervaded the Rostóv household that winter and, now after
Dólokhov’s proposal and Iogel’s ball, seemed to have grown thicker
round Sónya and Natásha as the air does before a thunderstorm. Sónya
and Natásha, in the light-blue dresses they had worn at the theater,
looking pretty and conscious of it, were standing by the clavichord,
happy and smiling. Véra was playing chess with Shinshín in the drawing
room. The old countess, waiting for the return of her husband and son,
Denísov, with sparkling eyes and ruffled hair, sat at the clavichord
striking chords with his short fingers, his legs thrown back and his
verses called “Enchantress,” which he had composed, and to which he
black-agate eyes at the frightened and happy Natásha.
glancing into the drawing room, where he saw Véra and his mother with
“Ah, and here’s Nicholas!” cried Natásha, running up to him.
Nicholas went to her, kissed her hand, and sitting down silently at her
table began to watch her hands arranging the cards. From the dancing
room, they still heard the laughter and merry voices trying to persuade
am I to go?” thought Nicholas, and went again into the dancing room
Nicholas began pacing up and down the room.
“My God, I’m a ruined and dishonored man! A bullet through my brain
He continued to pace the room, looking gloomily at Denísov and the
girls and avoiding their eyes.
enjoyment by sympathy with anyone’s sorrow,” she felt, and she said
Having lifted her head and let her arms droop lifelessly, as ballet
stepped to the middle of the room and stood still.
sister. “Why isn’t she dull and ashamed?”
surroundings, and from her smiling lips flowed sounds which anyone may
produce at the same intervals and hold for the same time, but which
leave you cold a thousand times and the thousand and first time thrill
you and make you weep.
voice, with its incorrect breathing and labored transitions, was
it and wished to hear it again. In her voice there was a virginal
freshness, an unconsciousness of her own powers, and an as yet untrained
next note, the next phrase, and everything in the world was divided into
this misery, and money, and Dólokhov, and anger, and honor—it’s all
Oh, how that chord vibrated, and how moved was something that was finest
in the world and above everything in the world. “What were losses, and
Dólokhov, and words of honor?... All nonsense! One might kill and rob
and yet be happy....”
reality again presented itself. He got up without saying a word and went
came in from his club, cheerful and contented. Nicholas, hearing him
“Well—had a good time?” said the old count, smiling gaily and
Nicholas tried to say “Yes,” but could not: and he nearly burst into
sobs. The count was lighting his pipe and did not notice his son’s
“Ah, it can’t be avoided!” thought Nicholas, for the first and
“Very much,” said Nicholas flushing, and with a stupid careless
little, I mean a good deal, a great deal—forty three thousand.”
with an apoplectic flush over neck and nape as old people do.
“Well!...” said the old count, spreading out his arms and sinking
a bold, free, and easy tone, while in his soul he regarded himself as a
longed to kiss his father’s hands and kneel to beg his forgiveness,
but said, in a careless and even rude voice, that it happens to
The old count cast down his eyes on hearing his son’s words and began
seizing his father’s hand, he pressed it to his lips and burst into
While father and son were having their explanation, the mother and
dolls and who was still having lessons.
indignantly. “I come to ask you what to do, and you call it
“No, he’s not a fool!” replied Natásha indignantly and seriously.
“No, but what is it, my dear? Do you want me to go and tell him?”
married,” answered the countess sharply and sarcastically.
“No, not on any account! I will tell him myself, and you’ll listen
at the door,” and Natásha ran across the drawing room to the dancing
with his face in his hands.
fate. It is in your hands.”
Denísov bent over her hand and she heard strange sounds she did not
understand. She kissed his rough curly black head. At this instant, they
daughter is so young, and I thought that, as my son’s friend, you
“Countess...” said Denísov, with downcast eyes and a guilty face.
voice, “but believe me, I so adore your daughter and all your family
and seeing her severe face said: “Well, good-by, Countess,” and
kissing her hand, he left the room with quick resolute strides, without
not at once raise, and he spent most of his time in the girls’ room.
Sónya was more tender and devoted to him than ever. It was as if she
He filled the girls’ albums with verses and music, and having at last
sent Dólokhov the whole forty-three thousand rubles and received his
his acquaintances, to overtake his regiment which was already in Poland.
feet in their overboots on the table, and began to reflect.
“Will you have the portmanteaus brought in? And a bed got ready, and
begun to think of the last station and was still pondering on the same
The postmaster, his wife, the valet, and a peasant woman selling
spectacles unable to understand what they wanted or how they could go on
Sokólniki after the duel and had spent that first agonizing, sleepless
these same questions which he could not solve and yet could not cease to
The postmaster came in and began obsequiously to beg his excellency to
have the courier horses. It was plain that he was lying and only wanted
bad for another traveler, and for himself it’s unavoidable, because
considered myself injured, and Louis XVI was executed because they
considered him a criminal, and a year later they executed those who
should one love and what hate? What does one live for? And what am I?
What is life, and what is death? What power governs all?”
There was no answer to any of these questions, except one, and that
not a logical answer and not at all a reply to them. The answer was:
“You’ll die and all will end. You’ll die and know all, or cease
rubles I don’t know what to do with, and she stands in her tattered
less a prey to evil and death?—death which ends all and must come
and again it turned uselessly in the same place.
His servant handed him a half-cut novel, in the form of letters, by
Madame de Souza. He began reading about the sufferings and virtuous
once was—did not struggle, and perhaps she was right. Nothing has been
Everything within and around him seemed confused, senseless, and
Pierre took his feet off the table, stood up, and lay down on a bed that
had been got ready for him, glancing now and then at the newcomer, who,
with a gloomy and tired face, was wearily taking off his wraps with the
aid of his servant, and not looking at Pierre. With a pair of felt boots
on his thin bony legs, and keeping on a worn, nankeen-covered, sheepskin
its broad temples and close-cropped hair, and looked at Bezúkhov. The
stern, shrewd, and penetrating expression of that look struck Pierre. He
eyes. His shriveled old hands were folded and on the finger of one of
it seemed to Pierre, sunk in profound and calm meditation. His servant
This active old servant was unpacking the traveler’s canteen and
tumbler with tea for himself and one for the beardless old man to whom
he passed it. Pierre began to feel a sense of uneasiness, and the
unfinished bit of nibbled sugar, and asked if anything more would be
The servant handed him a book which Pierre took to be a devotional work,
and the traveler became absorbed in it. Pierre looked at him. All at
once the stranger closed the book, putting in a marker, and again,
position with his eyes shut. Pierre looked at him and had not time
to turn away when the old man, opening his eyes, fixed his steady and
Pierre felt confused and wished to avoid that look, but the bright old
mistaken,” said the stranger in a deliberate and loud voice.
Pierre looked silently and inquiringly at him over his spectacles.
“I have heard of you, my dear sir,” continued the stranger, “and
Pierre flushed and, hurriedly putting his legs down from the bed, bent
forward toward the old man with a forced and timid smile.
He paused, his gaze still on Pierre, and moved aside on the sofa by way
involuntarily, came up and sat down beside him.
are young and I am old. I should like to help you as far as lies in my
The stranger’s face was not genial, it was even cold and severe, but
in spite of this, both the face and words of his new acquaintance were
an unexpected and tenderly paternal way.
hands, he looked more closely at the ring, with its skull—a Masonic
stranger, looking deeper and deeper into Pierre’s eyes. “And in
their name and my own I hold out a brotherly hand to you.”
“I am afraid,” said Pierre, smiling, and wavering between the
confidence the personality of the Freemason inspired in him and his own
from understanding—how am I to put it?—I am afraid my way of looking
at the world is so opposed to yours that we shall not understand one
“I know your outlook,” said the Mason, “and the view of life you
mention, and which you think is the result of your own mental efforts,
is the one held by the majority of people, and is the invariable fruit
of pride, indolence, and ignorance. Forgive me, my dear sir, but if I
whose words struck Pierre more and more by their precision and firmness.
a worthy dwelling place of the Great God,” he added, and closed his
God,” said Pierre, regretfully and with an effort, feeling it
The Mason looked intently at Pierre and smiled as a rich man with
millions in hand might smile at a poor fellow who told him that he, poor
cannot know Him. You do not know Him and that is why you are unhappy.”
“You know Him not, my dear sir, and so you are very unhappy. You do
thee, and even in those blasphemous words thou hast just uttered!”
pronounced the Mason in a stern and tremulous voice.
He paused and sighed, evidently trying to calm himself.
“If He were not,” he said quietly, “you and I would not be
hast thou denied?” he suddenly asked with exulting austerity and
didst thou, and why did the whole world, conceive the idea of the
eternal, and infinite in all His attributes?...”
He stopped and remained silent for a long time.
Pierre could not and did not wish to break this silence.
“He exists, but to understand Him is hard,” the Mason began again,
looking not at Pierre but straight before him, and turning the leaves
of his book with his old hands which from excitement he could not keep
bring him to thee, could take him by the hand and show him to thee. But
and all His mercy to one who is blind, or who shuts his eyes that he may
not see or understand Him and may not see or understand his own vileness
and sinfulness?” He paused again. “Who art thou? Thou dreamest that
went on, with a somber and scornful smile. “And thou art more foolish
and unreasonable than a little child, who, playing with the parts of a
skillfully made watch, dares to say that, as he does not understand
attain that knowledge and are still infinitely far from our aim; but
in our lack of understanding we see only our weakness and His
believes, in the speaker’s tone of conviction and earnestness, or
firmness and certainty of his vocation, which radiated from his whole
being (and which struck Pierre especially by contrast with his own
dejection and hopelessness)—at any rate, Pierre longed with his whole
soul to believe and he did believe, and felt a joyful sense of comfort,
regeneration, and return to life.
“I do not understand,” said Pierre, feeling with dismay doubts
“I don’t understand,” he said, “how it is that the mind of man
“The highest wisdom and truth are like the purest liquid we may wish
vessel and judge of its purity? Only by the inner purification of myself
worldly sciences of physics, history, chemistry, and the like, into
science explaining the whole creation and man’s place in it. To
receive that science it is necessary to purify and renew one’s inner
self, and so before one can know, it is necessary to believe and to
“Look then at thy inner self with the eyes of the spirit, and ask
good gifts? Are you content with yourself and with your life?”
“Thou hatest it. Then change it, purify thyself; and as thou art
How have you spent it? In riotous orgies and debauchery, receiving
everything from society and giving nothing in return. You have become
for your neighbor? Have you ever thought of your tens of thousands
of slaves? Have you helped them physically and morally? No! You have
woman; and what have you done? You have not helped her to find the way
of truth, my dear sir, but have thrust her into an abyss of deceit and
misery. A man offended you and you shot him, and you say you do not
know God and hate your life. There is nothing strange in that, my dear
leaned his arms on the back of the sofa and closed his eyes. Pierre
looked at that aged, stern, motionless, almost lifeless face and moved
The Mason cleared his throat huskily, as old men do, and called his
all, and without promising to help me?” thought Pierre, rising with
downcast head; and he began to pace the room, glancing occasionally at
and profligate life, though I did not like it and did not want to,”
thought Pierre. “But this man knows the truth and, if he wished to,
traveler, having packed his things with his practiced hands, began
fastening his coat. When he had finished, he turned to Bezúkhov, and
I, above all, who am to blame for everything. Help me, teach me, and
Pierre could not go on. He gulped and turned away.
Petersburg. Hand this to Count Willarski” (he took out his notebook
and wrote a few words on a large sheet of paper folded in four).
first of all devote some time to solitude and self-examination and do
my dear sir,” he added, seeing that his servant had entered... “and
and Martinists, even in Novíkov’s time. For a long while after he had
gone, Pierre did not go to bed or order horses but paced up and down
the room, pondering over his vicious past, and with a rapturous sense
the aim of supporting one another in the path of virtue, and that is how
he went nowhere and spent whole days in reading Thomas à Kempis, whose
of believing in the possibility of attaining perfection, and in the
into his room one evening in the official and ceremonious manner in
which Dólokhov’s second had called on him, and, having closed the
door behind him and satisfied himself that there was nobody else in the
“I have come to you with a message and an offer, Count,” he
said without sitting down. “A person of very high standing in our
before the usual term and has proposed to me to be your sponsor. I
to what he must do and how he should answer, Willarski only replied that
brothers more worthy than he would test him and that Pierre had only to
headquarters, and having ascended a dark staircase, they entered a small
something to him in French in an undertone and then went up to a small
Pierre’s eyes with it and tied it in a knot behind, catching some
hairs painfully in the knot. Then he drew his face down, kissed him, and
taking him by the hand led him forward. The hairs tied in the knot hurt
Pierre and there were lines of pain on his face and a shamefaced smile.
His huge figure, with arms hanging down and with a puckered, though
your eyes,” added Willarski. “I wish you courage and success,”
and, pressing Pierre’s hand, he went out.
he shrugged his shoulders and raised his hand to the kerchief, as if
with his eyes bandaged seemed to him an hour. His arms felt numb,
would happen to him and still more afraid of showing his fear. He felt
curious to know what was going to happen and what would be revealed to
would at last start on that path of regeneration and on the actively
Alexéevich. Loud knocks were heard at the door. Pierre took the bandage
off his eyes and glanced around him. The room was in black darkness,
and saw that the lamp stood on a black table on which lay an open book.
The book was the Gospel, and the white thing with the lamp inside was a
human skull with its cavities and teeth. After reading the first words
of the Gospel: “In the beginning was the Word and the Word was with
God,” Pierre went round the table and saw a large open box filled
seemed to him that he had expected all this and even more. Trying
words with vague yet joyful ideas. The door opened and someone came in.
table and placed on it his small leather-gloved hands.
This short man had on a white leather apron which covered his chest and
you, who do not believe in the truth of the light and who have not
At the moment the door opened and the stranger came in, Pierre felt a
sense of awe and veneration such as he had experienced in his boyhood at
breath and beating heart he moved toward the Rhetor (by which name the
Smolyanínov, and it mortified him to think that the newcomer was an
acquaintance—he wished him simply a brother and a virtuous instructor.
“Very well,” said Smolyanínov, and went on at once: “Have you any
aim?” said he quietly and quickly.
with a trembling voice and some difficulty in utterance due to his
excitement and to being unaccustomed to speak of abstract matters in
“I imagine that Freemasonry is the fraternity and equality of men who
“No, I considered it erroneous and did not follow it,” said Pierre,
so softly that the Rhetor did not hear him and asked him what he was
therefore you seek wisdom and virtue. Is that not so?” said the
The Rhetor cleared his throat, crossed his gloved hands on his breast,
and began to speak.
“and if this aim coincides with yours, you may enter our Brotherhood
with profit. The first and chief object of our Order, the foundation on
which it rests and which no human power can destroy, is the preservation
and handing on to posterity of a certain important mystery... which
prepared by long and diligent self-purification, not everyone can hope
our members as much as possible to reform their hearts, to purify and
enlighten their minds, by means handed on to us by tradition from those
who have striven to attain this mystery, and thereby to render them
“By purifying and regenerating our members we try, thirdly, to improve
and virtue, and thereby try with all our might to combat the evil which
sways the world. Think this over and I will come to you again.”
“To combat the evil which sways the world...” Pierre repeated, and a
He imagined men such as he had himself been a fortnight ago, and he
vicious and unfortunate people whom he would assist by word and deed,
and the second aim, that of purifying and regenerating himself, did not
was already perfectly cured of his former faults and was ready for all
from this distressful life, and leads it to its place of recompense and
soul: courage, generosity, morality, love of mankind, and especially
felt so glad to be free from his own lawlessness and to submit his will
virtue was and could not recall it.
The third time the Rhetor came back more quickly and asked Pierre
whether he was still firm in his intention and determined to submit to
and virtue than mere words. This chamber with what you see therein
Pierre quickly took out his purse and watch, but could not manage for
Pierre took off his coat, waistcoat, and left boot according to the
left breast, and stooping down pulled up the left leg of his trousers
and was going to tuck up the other trouser leg to save this stranger the
trouble, but the Mason told him that was not necessary and gave him
doubt, and self-derision, which appeared on his face against his will,
Pierre stood with his arms hanging down and legs apart, before his
brother Rhetor, and awaited his further commands.
“And now, in token of candor, I ask you to reveal to me your chief
The Mason did not move and for a long time said nothing after this
answer. At last he moved up to Pierre and, taking the kerchief that lay
yourself, put a bridle on your senses, and seek blessedness, not in
replied: “Yes, yes, I agree,” and with a beaming, childlike smile,
his fat chest uncovered, stepping unevenly and timidly in one slippered
and one booted foot, he advanced, while Willarski held a sword to his
backwards and forwards and was at last brought to the doors of the
blindfolded) questioned him as to who he was, when and where he was
born, and so on. Then he was again led somewhere still blindfolded,
and as they went along he was told allegories of the toils of his
universe, and of the courage with which he should endure toils and
dangers. During these wanderings, Pierre noticed that he was spoken
of now as the “Seeker,” now as the “Sufferer,” and now as the
mallets and swords. As he was being led up to some object he noticed a
hesitation and uncertainty among his conductors. He heard those around
him disputing in whispers and one of them insisting that he should be
led along a certain carpet. After that they took his right hand, placed
it on something, and told him to hold a pair of compasses to his left
breast with the other hand and to repeat after someone who read aloud
an oath of fidelity to the laws of the Order. The candles were then
extinguished and some spirit lighted, as Pierre knew by the smell, and
he was told that he would now see the lesser light. The bandage was
taken off his eyes and, by the faint light of the burning spirit,
Pierre, as in a dream, saw several men standing before him, wearing
aprons like the Rhetor’s and holding swords in their hands pointed at
him and he was at once blindfolded again.
candles were relit and he was told that he would see the full light; the
bandage was again removed and more than ten voices said together: “Sic
Pierre gradually began to recover himself and looked about at the room
and at the people in it. Round a long table covered with black sat some
distinguished dignitary and a Swiss who had formerly been tutor at the
of the President, who held a mallet in his hand. Let into the wall was
altar on which lay a Testament and a skull. Round it stood seven large
candlesticks like those used in churches. Two of the brothers led Pierre
up to the altar, placed his feet at right angles, and bade him lie down,
obeying, and suddenly doubts arose in his mind. “Where am I? What am
through, and realized that he could not stop halfway. He was aghast
at his hesitation and, trying to arouse his former devotional feeling,
he had lain there some time, he was told to get up, and a white leather
and three pairs of gloves, and then the Grand Master addressed him. He
apron, which symbolized strength and purity; then of the unexplained
and indulgently to smooth with it the heart of his neighbor. As to the
he was to wear at the meetings, and finally of the third, a pair of
hands that are unclean.” While the Grand Master said these last words
looking about him uneasily, and an awkward pause followed.
rug and began reading to him from a manuscript book an explanation of
trowel, a rough stone and a squared stone, a pillar, three windows, and
the Lodge, told the password, and at last was permitted to sit down.
The Grand Master began reading the statutes. They were very long, and
Pierre, from joy, agitation, and embarrassment, was not in a state to
understand what was being read. He managed to follow only the last words
of the statutes and these remained in his mind.
“In our temples we recognize no other distinctions,” read the Grand
Master, “but those between virtue and vice. Beware of making any
never bear malice or enmity toward thy brother. Be kindly and courteous.
neighbor, and may envy never dim the purity of that bliss. Forgive thy
He finished and, getting up, embraced and kissed Pierre, who, with tears
congratulations and greetings from acquaintances that met him on all
brothers, and burned with impatience to set to work with them.
The Grand Master rapped with his mallet. All the Masons sat down in
their places, and one of them read an exhortation on the necessity of
The Grand Master proposed that the last duty should be performed,
and the distinguished dignitary who bore the title of “Collector
The meeting was at an end, and on reaching home Pierre felt as if he had
become completely changed, and had quite left behind his former habits
and way of life.
home reading a book and trying to fathom the significance of the Square,
physical things, and the fourth a combination of these. Now and then
his attention wandered from the book and the Square and he formed in
had heard that a rumor of his duel had reached the Emperor and that it
estates in the south and there attending to the welfare of his serfs.
Prince Vasíli, as he entered. “I know all about it, and I can tell
know all about it and understand it all,” he said. “You behaved as
go into that. But consider the position in which you are placing her and
me in the eyes of society, and even of the court,” he added, lowering
his voice. “She is living in Moscow and you are here. Remember,
dear boy,” and he drew Pierre’s arm downwards, “it is simply a
misunderstanding. I expect you feel it so yourself. Let us write her
a letter at once, and she’ll come here and all will be explained, or
Pierre tried several times to speak, but, on one hand, Prince Vasíli
did not let him and, on the other, Pierre himself feared to begin to
speak in the tone of decided refusal and disagreement in which he had
Masonic statutes, “be kindly and courteous,” recurred to him. He
blinked, went red, got up and sat down again, struggling with himself
unable to withstand it now, but he also felt that on what he said now
and I’ll write to her myself, and we will kill the fatted calf.”
without looking at him, and with a kind of fury that made him like his
and opened the door for him.
“Go!” he repeated, amazed at himself and glad to see the look of
confusion and fear that showed itself on Prince Vasíli’s face.
and leaving large sums of money with them for alms, went away to his
estates. His new brethren gave him letters to the Kiev and Odessa Masons
and promised to write to him and guide him in his new activity.
The duel between Pierre and Dólokhov was hushed up and, in spite of
an illegitimate son, and petted and extolled when he was the best
marriage—when the marriageable daughters and their mothers had nothing
to hope from him—especially as he did not know how, and did not
happened, he was said to be insanely jealous and subject like his
due to her misfortune. When conversation turned on her husband Hélène
acquired though she did not understand its significance. This expression
and that her husband was a cross laid upon her by God. Prince Vasíli
was mentioned and, pointing to his forehead, remarked:
Pierre, “I said at the time and before anyone else” (she insisted
was in raptures about him, when he had just returned from abroad, and
And how has it ended? I was against this marriage even then and foretold
and interesting person to the visitors and that nowhere else was the
society so dearly and distinctly indicated.
destruction of the Prussian army at Jena and Auerstädt and the
troops had already entered Prussia and our second war with Napoleon
by her husband, Mortemart, the delightful Prince Hippolyte who had
de beaucoup de mérite), a newly appointed maid of honor and her mother,
and several other less noteworthy persons.
the Prussian army and was aide-de-camp to a very important personage.
“Whatever the European sovereigns and commanders may do to
countenance Bonaparte, and to cause me, and us in general, annoyance and
to express our sincere views on that subject, and can only say to the
King of Prussia and others: ‘So much the worse for you. Tu l’as
voulu, George Dandin,’ that’s all we have to say about it!”
room, almost all the company had assembled, and the conversation, guided
by Anna Pávlovna, was about our diplomatic relations with Austria and
Borís, grown more manly and looking fresh, rosy and self-possessed,
aide-de-camp and was duly conducted to pay his respects to the aunt and
Anna Pávlovna gave him her shriveled hand to kiss and introduced him to
and simply, “Mr. Shítov—a man of great merit”—this of the man
Thanks to Anna Mikháylovna’s efforts, his own tastes, and the
Prussia, and had just returned from there as a special messenger. He had
been so pleased at Olmütz and according to which an ensign might rank
incomparably higher than a general, and according to which what was
grant rewards, and he was himself often surprised at the rapidity of his
success and at the inability of others to understand these things.
be better dressed than others, and would rather deprive himself of many
and sought the acquaintance of only those above him in position and
who could therefore be of use to him. He liked Petersburg and despised
Moscow. The remembrance of the Rostóvs’ house and of his childish
love for Natásha was unpleasant to him and he had not once been to see
service, and he at once understood his role, letting his hostess make
each of those present, and the advantages that might accrue. He took
the seat indicated to him beside the fair Hélène and listened to the
them, and she doubts the means we have of gaining them. That is the
“We must distinguish between the Vienna cabinet and the Emperor of
After that Anna Pávlovna led up to the courage and firmness of the King
beautiful Hélène, whose eyes several times met those of the handsome
Borís to tell them about his journey to Glogau and in what state he
in pure, correct French many interesting details about the armies and
general attention, and Anna Pávlovna felt that the novelty she had
him several questions about his journey and seemed greatly interested in
“You absolutely must come and see me,” she said in a tone that
“On Tuesday between eight and nine. It will give me great pleasure.”
Borís promised to fulfill her wish and was about to begin a
“You know her husband, of course?” said Anna Pávlovna, closing her
eyes and indicating Hélène with a sorrowful gesture. “Ah, she is
such an unfortunate and charming woman! Don’t mention him before
When Borís and Anna Pávlovna returned to the others Prince Hippolyte
Bending forward in his armchair he said: “Le Roi de Prusse!” and
and then calmly and seriously sat back in his chair. Anna Pávlovna
Hippolyte interrupted her with the words: “Le Roi de Prusse...” and
again, as soon as all turned toward him, excused himself and said no
a joke he had heard in Vienna and which he had been trying all that
The conversation did not flag all evening and turned chiefly on the
significant command to come to her on Tuesday.
toward Anna Pávlovna, and Anna Pávlovna, with the same sad smile with
him to come. There were other guests and the countess talked little to
him, and only as he kissed her hand on taking leave said unexpectedly
and in a whisper, with a strangely unsmiling face: “Come to dinner
The war was flaming up and nearing the Russian frontier. Everywhere one
heard curses on Bonaparte, “the enemy of mankind.” Militiamen and
recruits were being enrolled in the villages, and from the seat of
war came contradictory news, false as usual and therefore variously
interpreted. The life of old Prince Bolkónski, Prince Andrew, and
In 1806 the old prince was made one of the eight commanders in chief
himself, and this fresh opportunity for action gave him new energy
and strength. He was continually traveling through the three provinces
to cruel with his subordinates, and went into everything down to the
mathematics from her father, and when the old prince was at home went
to his study with the wet nurse and little Prince Nicholas (as his
grandfather called him). The baby Prince Nicholas lived with his wet
nurse and nurse Sávishna in the late princess’ rooms and Princess
passionately fond of the boy, and Princess Mary often deprived herself
to give her friend the pleasure of dandling the little angel—as she
called her nephew—and playing with him.
tomb of the little princess, and in this chapel was a marble monument
about to smile, and once on coming out of the chapel Prince Andrew and
his father’s peculiarities, and partly because he needed solitude,
Prince Andrew made use of Boguchárovo, began building and spent most of
to continue his military service, and when the war recommenced
and everybody had to serve, he took a post under his father in the
recruitment so as to avoid active service. The old prince and his son
while Prince Andrew on the contrary, taking no part in the war and
had driven the old prince to town returned bringing papers and letters
child’s little chair while, frowning and with trembling hands, he
“What is it?” he said crossly, and, his hand shaking
mixture onto the floor and asked for some more water. The maid brought
table, a child’s table, and the little chair on which Prince Andrew
was sitting. The curtains were drawn, and a single candle was burning on
the cot where she was standing, “better wait a bit... later...”
“Oh, leave off, you always talk nonsense and keep putting things
off—and this is what comes of it!” said Prince Andrew in an
Prince Andrew got up and went on tiptoe up to the little bed, wineglass
in hand.
Princess Mary, evidently intimidated and confused that her opinion
doctor and expecting another for whom they had sent to town, they had
been trying first one remedy and then another. Worn out by sleeplessness
and anxiety they threw their burden of sorrow on one another and
reproached and disputed with each other.
“Devil take them!” he muttered, and after listening to the verbal
instructions his father had sent and taking the correspondence and his
Prince Andrew went up to the child and felt him. He was burning hot.
“Confound you and your Karl Ivánich!” He took the glass with the
drops and again went up to the cot.
and stooped glass in hand over the infant.
and calling the nurse began giving the medicine. The child screamed
hoarsely. Prince Andrew winced and, clutching his head, went out and sat
He still had all the letters in his hand. Opening them mechanically he
began reading. The old prince, now and then using abbreviations, wrote
in his large elongated hand on blue paper as follows:
and the rewards sent to the army are innumerable. Though he is a
German—I congratulate him! I can’t make out what the commander at
Kórchevo—a certain Khandrikóv—is up to; till now the additional
men and provisions have not arrived. Gallop off to him at once and
from Pétenka—he took part in it—and it’s all true. When
without delay and carry out instructions!
Prince Andrew sighed and broke the seal of another envelope. It was
without reading it and reread his father’s letter, ending with the
words: “Gallop off to Kórchevo and carry out instructions!”
he, going to the door and looking into the nursery.
Princess Mary was still standing by the cot, gently rocking the baby.
“Ah yes, and what else did he say that’s unpleasant?” thought
understanding half of it, read only to forget, if but for a moment, what
Bilíbin was now at army headquarters in a diplomatic capacity, and
though he wrote in French and used French jests and French idioms,
he described the whole campaign with a fearless self-censure and
diplomatic discretion tormented him, and he was happy to have in Prince
have certainly acquired a taste for war, and it is just as well for me;
our fine speeches and in his rude and savage way throws himself on the
and in two twists of the hand he breaks them to smithereens and installs
Bonaparte, ‘that Your Majesty should be received and treated in my
palace in a manner agreeable to yourself, and in so far as circumstances
the French and lay down their arms at the first demand.
“The head of the garrison at Glogau, with ten thousand men, asks the
it turns out that we have landed ourselves in war, and what is more,
in war on our own frontiers, with and for the King of Prussia. We have
a commander in chief. As it was considered that the Austerlitz success
might have been more decisive had the commander in chief not been so
young, all our octogenarians were reviewed, and of Prozoróvski
and Kámenski the latter was preferred. The general comes to us,
Suvórov-like, in a kibítka, and is received with acclamations of joy
and triumph.
himself. I am called in to help sort the letters and take those meant
for us. The field marshal looks on and waits for letters addressed
impatient and sets to work himself and finds letters from the Emperor
to Count T., Prince V., and others. Then he bursts into one of his wild
furies and rages at everyone and everything, seizes the letters, opens
them, and reads those from the Emperor addressed to others. ‘Ah! So
“‘I am wounded and cannot ride and consequently cannot command the
exposed, and without fuel or forage, so something must be done, and, as
my riding and commanding so vast an army, so I have passed on the
command to the general next in seniority, Count Buxhöwden, having sent
him my whole staff and all that belongs to it, advising him if there is
one day’s ration of bread remains, and in some regiments none at all,
as reported by the division commanders, Ostermann and Sedmorétzki, and
already in any case dishonored by being unable to fulfill the great and
secretary rather than commander in the army. My removal from the army
thousands such as I in Russia.’
“The field marshal is angry with the Emperor and he punishes us all,
interesting and entertaining. After the field marshal’s departure
it appears that we are within sight of the enemy and must give battle.
Buxhöwden is commander in chief by seniority, but General Bennigsen
does not quite see it; more particularly as it is he and his corps who
are within sight of the enemy and he wishes to profit by the opportunity
to fight a battle ‘on his own hand’ as the Germans say. He does so.
retreat after a battle have lost it is what we say; and according to
victory, and General Bennigsen, hoping to receive from Petersburg the
post of commander in chief as a reward for his victory, does not give up
the command of the army to General Buxhöwden. During this interregnum
we begin a very original and interesting series of maneuvers. Our aim is
but attacked and captured by a superior enemy force as a result of one
recross to the other. At last our enemy, Buxhöwden, catches us and
attacks. Both generals are angry, and the result is a challenge on
Buxhöwden’s part and an epileptic fit on Bennigsen’s. But at the
Pultúsk to Petersburg returns bringing our appointment as commander in
chief, and our first foe, Buxhöwden, is vanquished; we can now turn
soldiers, loudly demanding bread, meat, biscuits, fodder, and whatnot!
and in a way of which our last campaign can give you no idea. Half the
regiments form bands and scour the countryside and put everything
to fire and sword. The inhabitants are totally ruined, the hospitals
overflow with sick, and famine is everywhere. Twice the marauders even
attack our headquarters, and the commander in chief has to ask for a
my empty portmanteau and my dressing gown. The Emperor proposes to give
all commanders of divisions the right to shoot marauders, but I much
Bilíbin), what he had read began to interest him more and more. When he
had read thus far, he crumpled the letter up and threw it away. It was
had read, and listened to what was passing in the nursery. Suddenly he
reading the letter. He went on tiptoe to the nursery door and opened it.
with a scared look and that Princess Mary was no longer by the cot.
As often happens after long sleeplessness and long anxiety, he was
dead. All that he saw and heard seemed to confirm this terror.
“All is over,” he thought, and a cold sweat broke out on his
empty and that the nurse had been hiding the dead baby. He drew the
curtain aside and for some time his frightened, restless eyes could not
lay across the bed with his head lower than the pillow, and was smacking
his lips in his sleep and breathing evenly.
already lost him. He bent over him and, as his sister had taught him,
forehead was moist. Prince Andrew touched the head with his hand; even
but evidently the crisis was over and he was convalescent. Prince Andrew
head and at the little arms and legs which showed under the blanket. He
heard a rustle behind him and a shadow appeared under the curtain of
and dropped it again behind her. Prince Andrew recognized her without
looking and held out his hand to her. She pressed it.
The child moved slightly in his sleep, smiled, and rubbed his forehead
were in them. She leaned over to her brother and kissed him, slightly
and stood still in the dim light beneath the curtain as if not wishing
and explained to them his intentions and wishes. He told them that steps
would be taken immediately to free his serfs—and that till then they
punishments were to be admonitory and not corporal, and hospitals,
asylums, and schools were to be established on all the estates. Some of
with their management and embezzlement of money, some after their first
fright were amused by Pierre’s lisp and the new words they had not
this speech how they could best handle the master for their own ends.
income which was said to amount to five hundred thousand rubles a year,
an allowance of ten thousand rubles. He had a dim perception of the
About 80,000 went in payments on all the estates to the Land Bank, about
and the allowance to the three princesses; about 15,000 was given in
pensions and the same amount for asylums; 150,000 alimony was sent to
two years, and he did not know how the rest, about 100,000 rubles, was
spent, and almost every year he was obliged to borrow. Besides this the
chief steward wrote every year telling him of fires and bad harvests,
or of the necessity of rebuilding factories and workshops. So the first
consultations were detached from real affairs and did not link up with
them or make them move. On the one hand, the chief steward put the state
paying off the debts and undertaking new activities with serf labor,
to which Pierre did not agree. On the other hand, Pierre demanded that
showing the necessity of first paying off the loans from the Land Bank,
and the consequent impossibility of a speedy emancipation.
the forests in the province of Kostromá, the land lower down the river,
and the Crimean estate, in order to make it possible: all of which
measures—the removal of injunctions, petitions, permits, and so
on—that Pierre became quite bewildered and only replied:
to attend to the business himself and so he disliked it and only tried
consultations very valuable for the proprietor and troublesome to
In Kiev Pierre found some people he knew, and strangers hastened to make
his acquaintance and joyfully welcomed the rich newcomer, the
largest landowner of the province. Temptations to Pierre’s greatest
weeks, and months of his life passed in as great a rush and were as much
occupied with evening parties, dinners, lunches, and balls, giving him
life, and that of the seven virtues he lacked two—morality and the
another of the precepts—that of reforming the human race—and had
other virtues—love of his neighbor, and especially generosity.
intended to visit all his estates and see for himself how far his orders
had been carried out and in what state were the serfs whom God had
entrusted to his care and whom he intended to benefit.
insane—unprofitable to himself, to the count, and to the serfs—made
buildings—schools, hospitals, and asylums—on all the estates
such gratefully religious ones, with offerings of icons and the bread
and salt of hospitality, as, according to his understanding of his
master, would touch and delude him.
carriage, and the solitude of the road, all had a gladdening effect on
than the other; the serfs everywhere seemed thriving and touchingly
and salt and an icon of Saint Peter and Saint Paul, asking permission,
of Peter and Paul, his patron saints. In another place the women with
instructing in reading, writing, and religion. On all his estates Pierre
all on one plan, for hospitals, schools, and almshouses, which were soon
which the serfs’ manorial labor had been diminished, and heard the
with bread and salt and wished to build a chantry in honor of Peter and
and that the richest peasants (who formed the deputation) had begun
since the nursing mothers were no longer sent to work on his land, they
did still harder work on their own land. He did not know that the priest
who met him with the cross oppressed the peasants by his exactions, and
and secured their release by heavy payments. He did not know that the
to his estates and quite recovered the philanthropic mood in which
he had left Petersburg, and wrote enthusiastic letters to his
“brother-instructor” as he called the Grand Master.
thought Pierre, “and how little attention we pay to it!”
through the naïve and intelligent count and played with him as with
pressed him still harder with proofs of the impossibility and above all
difficult to imagine happier people, and that God only knew what would
the sale of the land and forests and to release them from the Land Bank,
but would probably never even inquire and would never know that the
newly erected buildings were standing empty and that the serfs continued
to give in money and work all that other people’s serfs gave—that is
fields and forests of fir and birch, which were partly cut down. The
house lay behind a newly dug pond filled with water to the brink and
bathhouse, a lodge, and a large brick house with semicircular façade
out. The fences and gates were new and solid; two fire pumps and a
the bridges were strong and had handrails. Everything bore an impress of
tidiness and good management. Some domestic serfs Pierre met, in reply
prince was at home, and showed him into a clean little anteroom.
wooden walls redolent of pine, and would have gone farther, but Antón
ran ahead on tiptoe and knocked at a door.
“Ask him to wait,” and the sound was heard of a chair being pushed
Pierre went with rapid steps to the door and suddenly came face to
face with Prince Andrew, who came out frowning and looking old. Pierre
embraced him and lifting his spectacles kissed his friend on the cheek
and looked at him closely.
was struck by the change in him. His words were kindly and there was a
smile on his lips and face, but his eyes were dull and lifeless and in
and glad sparkle. Prince Andrew had grown thinner, paler, and more
manly-looking, but what amazed and estranged Pierre till he got used
to it were his inertia and a wrinkle on his brow indicating prolonged
put questions and gave brief replies about things they knew ought to
for the future, Pierre’s journeys and occupations, the war, and so
on. The preoccupation and despondency which Pierre had noticed in his
enthusiasms, dreams, and hopes of happiness or goodness, in Prince
which had been particularly revived and strengthened by his late tour.
different, and better, Pierre than he had been in Petersburg.
“Well, and you? What are your plans?”
Pierre looked silently and searchingly into Prince Andrew’s face,
and all you have been doing on your estates.”
had been doing, as though it were all an old-time story, and he listened
Pierre felt uncomfortable and even depressed in his friend’s company
and at last became silent.
evidently also felt depressed and constrained with his visitor, “I am
only bivouacking here and have just come to look round. I am going back
They went out and walked about till dinnertime, talking of the political
news and common acquaintances like people who do not know each other
intimately. Prince Andrew spoke with some animation and interest only of
the new homestead he was constructing and its buildings, but even here,
“However, this is not at all interesting. Let us have dinner, and then
Pierre blushed, as he always did when it was mentioned, and said
know it is all over, and forever.”
to know what is right and what is wrong. Men always did and always will
err, and in nothing more than in what they consider right and wrong.”
roused, had begun to talk, and wanted to express what had brought him to
more and more animated and evidently wishing to express his new outlook
life: remorse and illness. The only good is the absence of those evils.
“And love of one’s neighbor, and self-sacrifice?” began Pierre.
“No, I can’t agree with you! To live only so as not to do evil and
myself and ruined my life. And only now when I am living, or at least
shall not agree with you, and you do not really believe what you are
yourself and say you nearly ruined your life and only found happiness
lived for others, and not almost, but quite, ruined my life. And I have
growing excited. “What about your son, your sister, and your
as you and Princess Mary call it, are the chief source of all error and
“You are joking,” replied Pierre, growing more and more excited.
“What error or evil can there be in my wishing to do good, and even
doing a little—though I did very little and did it very badly? What
ourselves, were growing up and dying with no idea of God and truth
beyond ceremonies and meaningless prayers and are now instructed in
a comforting belief in future life, retribution, recompense, and
consolation? What evil and error are there in it, if people were dying
rendered, and I supplied them with a doctor, a hospital, and an asylum
peasant, or a woman with a baby, has no rest day or night and I give
them rest and leisure?” said Pierre, hurrying and lisping. “And
I have done that though badly and to a small extent; but I have done
something toward it and you cannot persuade me that it was not a good
action, and more than that, you can’t make me believe that you do not
know, and know for certain, that the enjoyment of doing this good is the
Prince Andrew. “I build a house and lay out a garden, and you build
hospitals. The one and the other may serve as a pastime. But what’s
right and what’s good must be judged by one who knows all, but not by
They rose from the table and sat down in the entrance porch which served
as a veranda.
schools,” he went on, crooking a finger, “education and so forth;
them taking off his cap) “from his animal condition and awaken in him
happiness possible, and that is just what you want to deprive him of.
after two in the morning, thoughts come and I can’t sleep but toss
about till dawn, because I think and can’t help thinking, just as
he can’t help plowing and mowing; if he didn’t, he would go to the
drink shop or fall ill. Just as I could not stand his terrible physical
labor but should die of it in a week, so he could not stand my physical
idleness, but would grow fat and die. The third thing—what else was
it you talked about?” and Prince Andrew crooked a third finger. “Ah,
yes, hospitals, medicine. He has a fit, he is dying, and you come and
bleed him and patch him up. He will drag about as a cripple, a burden to
everybody, for another ten years. It would be far easier and simpler for
him to die. Others are being born and there are plenty of them as it is.
Killed them, yes!” said he, frowning angrily and turning away from
Prince Andrew expressed his ideas so clearly and distinctly that it was
evident he had reflected on this subject more than once, and he spoke
readily and rapidly like a man who has not talked for a long time. His
understand how one can live with such ideas. I had such moments
myself not long ago, in Moscow and when traveling, but at such times I
me... myself most of all. Then I don’t eat, don’t wash... and how is
nothing, but here on the one hand the local nobility have done me the
out of it. They could not understand that I have not the necessary
command of the Third District, and my only way of avoiding active
his time. But he is growing old, and though not exactly cruel he has too
terrible, and now he has this authority of a commander in chief of
I alone have any influence with my father, and now and then can save him
did not, and do not, in the least care about that scoundrel of a clerk
Prince Andrew grew more and more animated. His eyes glittered feverishly
anyone flogged or sent to Siberia—and still less for your serfs. If
any the worse off. In Siberia they lead the same animal life, and the
stripes on their bodies heal, and they are happy as before. But it is
themselves, stifle this remorse and grow callous, as a result of being
able to inflict punishments justly and unjustly. It is those people I
pity, and for their sake I should like to liberate the serfs. You
become cruel and harsh, are conscious of it, but cannot restrain
themselves and grow more and more miserable.”
purity, and not the serfs’ backs and foreheads, which, beat and shave
as you may, always remain the same backs and foreheads.”
“No, no! A thousand times no! I shall never agree with you,” said
In the evening Andrew and Pierre got into the open carriage and drove to
Bald Hills. Prince Andrew, glancing at Pierre, broke the silence now and
his husbandry.
Pierre remained gloomily silent, answering in monosyllables and
see the true light, and that he, Pierre, ought to aid, enlighten, and
